Texas statutes.
GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 4. EXECUTIVE BRANCH

SUBTITLE G. CORRECTIONS

CHAPTER 508. PAROLE AND MANDATORY SUPERVISION

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 508.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Board" means the Board of Pardons and Paroles.

(2) "Community supervision and corrections department" means a department established under Chapter 76.

(3) "Director" means the director of the pardons and paroles division.

(4) "Division" means the pardons and paroles division.

(5) "Mandatory supervision" means the release of an eligible inmate sentenced to the institutional division so that the inmate may serve the remainder of the inmate's sentence not on parole but under the supervision of the pardons and paroles division.

(6) "Parole" means the discretionary and conditional release of an eligible inmate sentenced to the institutional division so that the inmate may serve the remainder of the inmate's sentence under the supervision of the pardons and paroles division.

(7) "Parole officer" means a person appointed by the director and assigned the duties of assessment of risks and needs, investigation, case management, and supervision of releasees to ensure that releasees are complying with the conditions of parole or mandatory supervision.

(8) "Parole commissioner" means a person employed by the board to perform the duties described by Section 508.0441.

(9) "Releasee" means a person released on parole or to mandatory supervision.

(10) "Presiding officer" means the presiding officer of the Board of Pardons and Paroles.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 12.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 62, Sec. 10.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1999; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., 3rd C.S., ch. 3, Sec. 11.02, eff. Jan. 11, 2004.

Sec. 508.002. CLEMENCY, COMMUTATION DISTINGUISHED. Neither parole nor mandatory supervision is a commutation of sentence or any other form of clemency.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 12.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 508.003. INAPPLICABLE TO JUVENILES AND CERTAIN INMATES. (a) This chapter does not apply to an emergency absence under escort granted to an inmate by the institutional division under Section 501.006.

(b) Except as provided by Subsection (c), this chapter does not apply to release on parole from an institution for juveniles.

(c) The provisions of this chapter not in conflict with Section 508.156 apply to parole of a person from the Texas Juvenile Justice Department or from a post-adjudication secure correctional facility operated by or under contract with a juvenile board or local juvenile probation department under that section.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 12.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 734 (H.B. 1549), Sec. 100, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 854 (S.B. 1149), Sec. 6, eff. September 1, 2015.

SUBCHAPTER B. BOARD OF PARDONS AND PAROLES

Sec. 508.031. COMPOSITION OF BOARD. (a) The board consists of seven members appointed by the governor with the advice and consent of the senate.

(b) Appointments to the board must be made without regard to the race, color, disability, sex, religion, age, or national origin of the appointed members.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 12.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 554, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., 3rd C.S., ch. 3, Sec. 11.03, eff. Jan. 11, 2004.

Sec. 508.032. REQUIREMENTS FOR MEMBERSHIP. (a) Board members must be representative of the general public.

(b) A member must have resided in this state for the two years before appointment.

(c)(1) A person who is a former employee of the department may not serve on the board before the second anniversary of the date the person terminated employment with the department.

(2) A person who is employed by the department on August 1, 2003, may not serve on the board before August 1, 2005.

(d) At any time not more than three members of the board may be former employees of the department.

(e) For purposes of Subsections (c) and (d), previous service as a board member is not considered to be employment with the department.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 12.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., 3rd C.S., ch. 3, Sec. 11.04, eff. Jan. 11, 2004.

Sec. 508.033. DISQUALIFICATIONS. (a) A person is not eligible for appointment as a member of the board or for employment as a parole commissioner if the person or the person's spouse:

(1) is employed by or participates in the management of a business entity or other organization receiving funds from the department or the board;

(2) owns or controls, directly or indirectly, more than a 10-percent interest in a business entity or other organization:

(A) regulated by the department; or

(B) receiving funds from the department or the board; or

(3) uses or receives a substantial amount of tangible goods, services, or funds from the department or the board, other than compensation or reimbursement authorized by law for board membership, attendance, or expenses.

(b) In determining eligibility under Subsection (a)(3), the compensation or reimbursement that a board member's spouse or parole commissioner's spouse receives as an employee of the board or the department may not be considered. This subsection does not affect any restriction on employment or board membership imposed by any other law.

(c) A person may not serve as a parole commissioner, may not be a member of the board, and may not be an employee of the division or the board employed in a "bona fide executive, administrative, or professional capacity," as that phrase is used for purposes of establishing an exemption to the overtime provisions of the federal Fair Labor Standards Act of 1938 (29 U.S.C. Section 201 et seq.) and its subsequent amendments, if:

(1) the person is an officer, employee, or paid consultant of a Texas trade association in the field of criminal justice; or

(2) the person's spouse is an officer, manager, or paid consultant of a Texas trade association in the field of criminal justice.

(d) A person who is required to register as a lobbyist under Chapter 305 because of the person's activities for compensation in or on behalf of a profession related to the operation of the board may not:

(1) serve as a member of the board or as a parole commissioner; or

(2) act as the general counsel to the board or division.

(e) In this section, "Texas trade association" means a cooperative and voluntarily joined association of business or professional competitors in this state designed to assist its members and its industry or profession in:

(1) dealing with mutual business or professional problems; and

(2) promoting their common interests.

(f) A person who is a current or former employee of the department may not serve as a parole commissioner before the second anniversary of the date the person's employment with the department ceases, and a member of the board may not serve as a parole commissioner before the second anniversary of the date the person's membership on the board ceases.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 12.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 62, Sec. 10.04, eff. Sept. 1, 1999; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 554, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1308 (S.B. 909), Sec. 33, eff. June 15, 2007.

Sec. 508.034. GROUNDS FOR REMOVAL. (a) It is a ground for removal from the board that a member:

(1) does not have at the time of taking office the qualification required by Section 508.032(b) for appointment to the board;

(2) is ineligible for membership under Section 508.033;

(3) is unable to discharge the member's duties for a substantial part of the term for which the member is appointed because of illness or disability; or

(4) is absent from more than half of the regularly scheduled board or panel meetings that the member is eligible to attend during each calendar year.

(b) The board administrator or the board administrator's designee shall provide to members of the board and to employees, as often as necessary, information regarding their qualification for office or employment under this chapter and their responsibilities under applicable laws relating to standards of conduct for state officers or employees.

(c) The validity of an action of the board or panel is not affected by the fact that the action is taken when a ground for removal of a board member exists.

(d) If the general counsel to the board has knowledge that a potential ground for removal exists, the general counsel shall notify the presiding officer of the board of the potential ground. The presiding officer shall notify the governor and the attorney general that a potential ground for removal exists. If the potential ground for removal involves the presiding officer, the general counsel to the board shall notify the governor and the attorney general that a potential ground for removal exists.

(e) It is a ground for removal from the board that a member fails to comply with policies or rules adopted by the board.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 12.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 62, Sec. 10.05, eff. Sept. 1, 1999; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 554, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1999; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 856, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., 3rd C.S., ch. 3, Sec. 11.05, eff. Jan. 11, 2004.

Sec. 508.035. PRESIDING OFFICER. (a) The governor shall designate one member to serve as presiding officer of the board.

(b) The presiding officer serves in that capacity at the pleasure of the governor.

(c) The presiding officer reports directly to the governor and serves as the administrative head of the board.

(d) The presiding officer may:

(1) delegate responsibilities and authority to other members of the board, parole commissioners, or to employees of the board;

(2) appoint advisory committees from the membership of the board or from parole commissioners to further the efficient administration of board business; and

(3) establish policies and procedures to further the efficient administration of the business of the board.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 12.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 856, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 2001; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., 3rd C.S., ch. 3, Sec. 11.06, eff. Jan. 11, 2004.

Sec. 508.036. GENERAL ADMINISTRATIVE DUTIES. (a) The presiding officer shall:

(1) develop and implement policies that clearly separate the policy-making responsibilities of the board and the management responsibilities of the board administrator, parole commissioners, and the staff of the board;

(2) establish caseloads and required work hours for members of the board and parole commissioners;

(3) update parole guidelines, assign precedential value to previous decisions of the board relating to the granting of parole and the revocation of parole or mandatory supervision, and develop policies to ensure that members of the board and parole commissioners use guidelines and previous decisions of the board and parole commissioners in making decisions under this chapter;

(4) require members of the board and parole commissioners to file activity reports that provide information on release decisions made by members of the board and parole commissioners, the workload and hours worked of the members of the board and parole commissioners, and the use of parole guidelines by members of the board and parole commissioners; and

(5) report at least annually to the governor and the legislature on the activities of the board and parole commissioners, parole release decisions, and the use of parole guidelines by the board and parole commissioners.

(b) The board shall:

(1) adopt rules relating to the decision-making processes used by the board and parole panels;

(2) prepare information of public interest describing the functions of the board and make the information available to the public and appropriate state agencies;

(3) comply with federal and state laws related to program and facility accessibility; and

(4) develop and implement policies that provide the public with a reasonable opportunity to appear before the board and to speak on any issue under the jurisdiction of the board, with the exception of an individual parole determination or clemency recommendation.

(c) The board administrator shall prepare and maintain a written plan that describes how a person who does not speak English can be provided reasonable access to the board's programs and services.

(d) The board, in performing its duties, is subject to the open meetings law, Chapter 551, and the administrative procedure law, Chapter 2001. This subsection does not affect the provisions of Section 2001.223 exempting hearings and interviews conducted by the board or the division from Section 2001.038 and Subchapters C-H, Chapter 2001.

(e) The board, in accordance with the rules and procedures of the Legislative Budget Board, shall prepare, approve, and submit a legislative appropriations request that is separate from the legislative appropriations request for the department and is used to develop the board's budget structure. The board shall maintain the board's legislative appropriations request and budget structure separately from those of the department.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 12.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 62, Sec. 10.06, eff. Sept. 1, 1999; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 856, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 2001; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1170, Sec. 31.01, eff. Sept. 1, 2003; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., 3rd C.S., ch. 3, Sec. 11.07, eff. Jan. 11, 2004.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1308 (S.B. 909), Sec. 34, eff. June 15, 2007.

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1308 (S.B. 909), Sec. 35, eff. June 15, 2007.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1083 (S.B. 1179), Sec. 9, eff. June 17, 2011.

Sec. 508.0362. TRAINING REQUIRED. (a) (1) A person who is appointed to and qualifies for office as a member of the board may not vote, deliberate, or be counted as a member in attendance at a meeting of the board until the person completes at least one course of a training program that complies with this section.

(2) A parole commissioner employed by the board may not vote or deliberate on a matter described by Section 508.0441 until the person completes at least one course of a training program that complies with this section.

(b) A training program must provide information to the person regarding:

(1) the enabling legislation that created the board;

(2) the programs operated by the board;

(3) the role and functions of the board and parole commissioners;

(4) the rules of the board;

(5) the current budget for the board;

(6) the results of the most recent formal audit of the board;

(7) the requirements of the:

(A) open meetings law, Chapter 551;

(B) open records law, Chapter 552; and

(C) administrative procedure law, Chapter 2001;

(8) the requirements of the conflict of interest laws and other laws relating to public officials; and

(9) any applicable ethics policies adopted by the board or the Texas Ethics Commission.

(c) A person appointed to the board is entitled to reimbursement, as provided by the General Appropriations Act, for the travel expenses incurred in attending the training program regardless of whether the attendance at the program occurs before or after the person qualifies for office.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 62, Sec. 10.08, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 554, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1999; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., 3rd C.S., ch. 3, Sec. 11.08, eff. Jan. 11, 2004.

Sec. 508.037. TERMS; REMOVAL. (a) A board member holds office for a term of six years.

(b) The terms of one-third of the members expire February 1 of each odd-numbered year.

(c) The governor may remove a board member, other than a member appointed by another governor, at any time and for any reason.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 12.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 508.038. VACANCIES. If a vacancy occurs, the governor shall appoint in the same manner as other appointments are made a person to serve the remainder of the unexpired term.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 12.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 508.039. COMPENSATION. A board member is paid the salary the legislature determines in the General Appropriations Act.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 12.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 508.040. PERSONNEL. (a) The presiding officer is responsible for the employment and supervision of:

(1) parole commissioners;

(2) a general counsel to the board;

(3) a board administrator to manage the day-to-day activities of the board;

(4) hearing officers;

(5) personnel to assist in clemency and hearing matters; and

(6) secretarial or clerical personnel.

(b) The board administrator or the board administrator's designee shall prepare and maintain a written policy statement that implements a program of equal employment opportunity under which all personnel decisions of the board are made without regard to race, color, disability, sex, religion, age, or national origin. The policy statement must include:

(1) personnel policies, including policies relating to recruitment, evaluation, selection, training, and promotion of personnel, that show the intent of the board to avoid the unlawful employment practices described by Chapter 21, Labor Code; and

(2) an analysis of the extent to which the composition of the board's personnel is in accordance with state and federal law and a description of reasonable methods to achieve compliance with state and federal law.

(c) The policy statement must be updated annually, be reviewed by the Commission on Human Rights for compliance with Subsection (b)(1), and be filed with the governor's office.

(d) The board administrator or the board administrator's designee shall develop an intra-agency career ladder program that addresses opportunities for mobility and advancement for employees within the board. The program shall require intra-agency posting of all positions concurrently with any public posting.

(e) The board administrator or the board administrator's designee shall develop a system of annual performance evaluations that are based on documented employee performance. All merit pay for board employees must be based on the system established under this subsection.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 12.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 62, Sec. 10.09, eff. Sept. 1, 1999; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 554, Sec. 5, eff. Sept. 1, 1999; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., 3rd C.S., ch. 3, Sec. 11.09, eff. Jan. 11, 2004.

Sec. 508.041. DESIGNEE TRAINING; HANDBOOK. (a) The board shall develop and implement:

(1) a training program that each newly hired employee of the board designated to conduct hearings under Section 508.281 must complete before conducting a hearing without the assistance of a board member or experienced parole commissioner or designee; and

(2) a training program to provide an annual update to designees of the board on issues and procedures relating to the revocation process.

(b) The board shall prepare and biennially update a procedural manual to be used by designees of the board. The board shall include in the manual:

(1) descriptions of decisions in previous hearings determined by the board to have value as precedents for decisions in subsequent hearings;

(2) laws and court decisions relevant to decision making in hearings; and

(3) case studies useful in decision making in hearings.

(c) The board shall prepare and update as necessary a handbook to be made available to participants in hearings under Section 508.281, such as defense attorneys, persons released on parole or mandatory supervision, and witnesses. The handbook must describe in plain language the procedures used in a hearing under Section 508.281.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 12.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 62, Sec. 10.10, eff. Sept. 1, 1999; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., 3rd C.S., ch. 3, Sec. 11.10, eff. Jan. 11, 2004.

Sec. 508.042. TRAINING PROGRAM FOR MEMBERS AND PAROLE COMMISSIONERS. (a) The board shall develop for board members and parole commissioners a comprehensive training and education program on the criminal justice system, with special emphasis on the parole process.

(b)(1) A new member may not participate in a vote of the board or a panel, deliberate, or be counted as a member in attendance at a meeting of the board until the member completes the program.

(2) A new parole commissioner may not participate in a vote of a panel until the commissioner completes the program. This subdivision does not apply to a new parole commissioner who as a board member completed the program.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 12.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 62, Sec. 10.11, eff. Sept. 1, 1999; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 554, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 1999; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., 3rd C.S., ch. 3, Sec. 11.11, eff. Jan. 11, 2004.

Sec. 508.043. GIFTS AND GRANTS. The board may apply for and accept gifts or grants from any public or private source for use in any lawful purpose of the board.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 12.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 508.044. POWERS AND DUTIES OF BOARD. A board member shall give full time to the duties of the member's office, including duties imposed on the board by the Texas Constitution and other law.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 12.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 62, Sec. 10.12 to 10.14, eff. Sept. 1, 1999; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 856, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 2001; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., 3rd C.S., ch. 3, Sec. 11.12, eff. Jan. 11, 2004.

Sec. 508.0441. RELEASE AND REVOCATION DUTIES. (a) Board members and parole commissioners shall determine:

(1) which inmates are to be released on parole or mandatory supervision;

(2) conditions of parole or mandatory supervision, including special conditions;

(3) the modification and withdrawal of conditions of parole or mandatory supervision;

(4) which releasees may be released from supervision and reporting; and

(5) the continuation, modification, and revocation of parole or mandatory supervision.

(b) The board shall develop and implement a policy that clearly defines circumstances under which a board member or parole commissioner should disqualify himself or herself from voting on:

(1) a parole decision; or

(2) a decision to revoke parole or mandatory supervision.

(c) The board may adopt reasonable rules as proper or necessary relating to:

(1) the eligibility of an inmate for release on parole or release to mandatory supervision;

(2) the conduct of a parole or mandatory supervision hearing; or

(3) conditions to be imposed on a releasee.

(d) The presiding officer may provide a written plan for the administrative review of actions taken by a parole panel by a review panel.

(e) Board members and parole commissioners shall, at the direction of the presiding officer, file activity reports on duties performed under this chapter.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 12.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 62, Sec. 10.12 to 10.14, eff. Sept. 1, 1999; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 856, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 2001. Redesignated from Government Code Sec. 508.044(b) to (f) and amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., 3rd C.S., ch. 3, Sec. 11.12, eff. Jan. 11, 2004.

Sec. 508.045. PAROLE PANELS. (a) Except as provided by Section 508.046, board members and parole commissioners shall act in panels composed of three in matters of:

(1) release on parole;

(2) release to mandatory supervision; and

(3) revocation of parole or mandatory supervision.

(b) The presiding officer shall designate the composition of each panel and shall designate panels composed of at least one board member and any combination of board members and parole commissioners.

(c) A parole panel may:

(1) grant, deny, or revoke parole;

(2) revoke mandatory supervision; and

(3) conduct parole revocation hearings and mandatory supervision revocation hearings.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 12.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., 3rd C.S., ch. 3, Sec. 11.13, eff. Jan. 11, 2004.

Sec. 508.046. EXTRAORDINARY VOTE REQUIRED. To release on parole an inmate who was convicted of an offense under Section 20A.03, 21.02, 21.11(a)(1), or 22.021, Penal Code, or who is required under Section 508.145(c) to serve 35 calendar years before becoming eligible for release on parole, all members of the board must vote on the release on parole of the inmate, and at least two-thirds of the members must vote in favor of the release on parole. A member of the board may not vote on the release unless the member first receives a copy of a written report from the department on the probability that the inmate would commit an offense after being released on parole.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 12.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 787 (S.B. 60), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 593 (H.B. 8), Sec. 3.38, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 122 (H.B. 3000), Sec. 9, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 508.047. MEETINGS. (a) The members of the board shall meet at least once in each quarter of the calendar year at a site determined by the presiding officer.

(b) The members of the board are not required to meet as a body to perform the members' duties in clemency matters.

(c) A majority of each parole panel constitutes a quorum for the transaction of the panel's business. A panel's decision must be by majority vote.

(d) The members of a parole panel are not required to meet as a body to perform the members' duties, except to conduct a hearing under Section 508.281.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 12.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 62, Sec. 10.15, eff. Sept. 1, 1999; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., 3rd C.S., ch. 3, Sec. 11.14, eff. Jan. 11, 2004.

Sec. 508.048. SUBPOENAS. (a) A parole panel may issue a subpoena requiring the attendance of a witness or the production of any record, book, paper, or document the panel considers necessary for investigation of the case of a person before the panel.

(b) A member of the board may sign a subpoena and administer an oath.

(c) A peace officer, parole officer, or community supervision and corrections department officer may serve the subpoena in the same manner as similar process in a court of record having original jurisdiction of criminal actions is served.

(d) A person who testifies falsely, fails to appear when subpoenaed, or fails or refuses to produce material under the subpoena is subject to the same orders and penalties to which a person taking those actions before a court is subject.

(e) On application of the board, a court of record having original jurisdiction of criminal actions may compel the attendance of a witness, the production of material, or the giving of testimony before the board, by an attachment for contempt or in the same manner as the court may otherwise compel the production of evidence.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 12.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 508.0481. VICTIM'S RIGHT TO REPRESENTATION. (a) If a victim, close relative of a deceased victim, or guardian of a victim is required by a subpoena issued under Section 508.048 to appear at a hearing, the victim, relative, or guardian is entitled to representation by counsel at the hearing.

(b) This section does not require the state to provide representation by counsel to a victim, close relative of a deceased victim, or guardian of a victim.

(c) In this section, "victim," "close relative of a deceased victim," and "guardian of a victim" have the meanings assigned by Section 508.117.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1034, Sec. 10, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 508.049. MISSION STATEMENT. (a) The board, after consultation with the governor and the Texas Board of Criminal Justice, shall adopt a mission statement that reflects the responsibilities for the operation of the parole process that are assigned to the board, the division, the department, or the Texas Board of Criminal Justice.

(b) The board shall include in the mission statement a description of specific locations at which the board intends to conduct business related to the operation of the parole process.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 12.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 62, Sec. 10.16, eff. Sept. 1, 1999; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., 3rd C.S., ch. 3, Sec. 11.15, eff. Jan. 11, 2004.

Sec. 508.050. REPORT TO GOVERNOR. (a) On request of the governor, the board shall investigate a person being considered by the governor for:

(1) pardon;

(2) commutation of sentence;

(3) reprieve;

(4) remission of fine; or

(5) forfeiture.

(b) The board shall report to the governor on its investigation and make recommendations about the person to the governor.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 12.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 508.051. SUNSET PROVISION. The Board of Pardons and Paroles is subject to review under Chapter 325 (Texas Sunset Act), but is not abolished under that chapter. The board shall be reviewed during the period in which the Texas Department of Criminal Justice is reviewed.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 12.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 62, Sec. 10.17, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 508.052. COMPUTERS; OFFICE SPACE; OTHER EQUIPMENT. (a) The department by interagency contract may provide to the board necessary computer equipment and computer access to all computerized records and physical access to all printed records in the custody of the department that are related to the duties and functions of the board.

(b) The department by interagency contract may provide to the board necessary and appropriate:

(1) office space at locations designated by the presiding officer of the board; and

(2) utilities and communications equipment.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 12.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 508.053. USE OF TECHNOLOGY. The board shall implement a policy requiring the board to use appropriate technological solutions to improve the board's ability to perform its functions. The policy must ensure that the public is able to interact with the board on the Internet.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1308 (S.B. 909), Sec. 36, eff. June 15, 2007.

Sec. 508.054. RECORDS OF COMPLAINTS. (a) The board shall maintain a system to promptly and efficiently act on complaints filed with the board. The board shall maintain information about parties to the complaint, the subject matter of the complaint, a summary of the results of the review or investigation of the complaint, and its disposition.

(b) The board shall make information available describing its procedures for complaint investigation and resolution.

(c) The board shall periodically notify the complaint parties of the status of the complaint until final disposition.

(d) This section does not apply to a complaint about an individual parole determination or clemency recommendation.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1308 (S.B. 909), Sec. 36, eff. June 15, 2007.

Sec. 508.055. NEGOTIATED RULEMAKING AND ALTERNATIVE DISPUTE RESOLUTION. (a) The board shall develop and implement a policy to encourage the use of:

(1) negotiated rulemaking procedures under Chapter 2008 for the adoption of board rules; and

(2) appropriate alternative dispute resolution procedures under Chapter 2009 to assist in the resolution of internal disputes under the board's jurisdiction.

(b) The board's procedures relating to alternative dispute resolution must conform, to the extent possible, to any model guidelines issued by the State Office of Administrative Hearings for the use of alternative dispute resolution by state agencies.

(c) The board shall designate a trained person to:

(1) coordinate the implementation of the policy adopted under Subsection (a);

(2) serve as a resource for any training needed to implement the procedures for negotiated rulemaking or alternative dispute resolution; and

(3) collect data concerning the effectiveness of those procedures, as implemented by the board.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1308 (S.B. 909), Sec. 36, eff. June 15, 2007.

SUBCHAPTER C. REPRESENTATION OF INMATES

Sec. 508.081. DEFINITIONS. In this subchapter:

(1) "Compensation" has the meaning assigned by Section 305.002.

(2) "Inmate" includes:

(A) an administrative releasee;

(B) an inmate imprisoned in the institutional division; and

(C) a person confined in a county jail awaiting:

(i) transfer to the institutional division; or

(ii) a revocation hearing.

(3) "Represent" means to directly or indirectly contact in person or by telephone, facsimile transmission, or correspondence a member or employee of the board or an employee of the department on behalf of an inmate.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 12.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 126 (H.B. 719), Sec. 7, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 508.082. RULES. The board shall adopt rules relating to:

(1) the submission and presentation of information and arguments to the board, a parole panel, and the department for and in behalf of an inmate; and

(2) the time, place, and manner of contact between a person representing an inmate and:

(A) a member of the board or a parole commissioner;

(B) an employee of the board; or

(C) an employee of the department.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 12.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 62, Sec. 10.18, eff. Sept. 1, 1999; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., 3rd C.S., ch. 3, Sec. 11.16, eff. Jan. 11, 2004.

Sec. 508.083. ELIGIBILITY TO REPRESENT INMATES. (a) A person who represents an inmate for compensation must:

(1) be an attorney licensed in this state; and

(2) register with the division.

(b) A person serving as a member or employee of the board or the Texas Board of Criminal Justice may not, before the second anniversary of the date the person ceases to be a board member or employee:

(1) represent any person in a matter before the board or a parole panel; or

(2) receive compensation for services rendered on behalf of any person regarding a matter pending before the board or a parole panel.

(c) A person, other than a person subject to Subsection (b), who is employed by the department may not, before the second anniversary of the date the person terminates service with the department:

(1) represent an inmate in a matter before the board or a parole panel; or

(2) receive compensation for services rendered on behalf of any person regarding a matter pending before the board or a parole panel.

(d) Repealed by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch 1007, Sec. 2.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 12.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1007, Sec. 1, 2, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 508.084. FEE AFFIDAVIT. (a) A person required to register under Section 508.083, before the person first contacts a member of the board, an employee of the board, or an employee of the department on behalf of an inmate, shall file a fee affidavit with the department in a form prescribed by the department for each inmate the person represents for compensation.

(b) The fee affidavit must be written and verified and contain a statement of:

(1) the registrant's full name and address;

(2) the registrant's normal business, business phone number, and business address;

(3) the full name of any former member or employee of the board or the Texas Board of Criminal Justice or any former employee of the department with whom the registrant:

(A) is associated;

(B) has a relationship as an employer or employee; or

(C) maintains a contractual relationship to provide services;

(4) the full name and institutional identification number of the inmate the registrant represents;

(5) the amount of compensation the registrant has received or expects to receive in exchange for the representation; and

(6) the name of the person providing the compensation.

(c) If a registrant receives compensation in excess of the amount reported on the fee affidavit, the registrant shall file with the department, not later than the fifth day after the date the registrant receives compensation in excess of the reported amount, a supplemental fee affidavit in a form prescribed by the department indicating the total amount of compensation received for representing the inmate.

(d) For each fee affidavit and supplemental fee affidavit received, the department shall:

(1) keep a copy of the affidavit in a central location; and

(2) not later than the third day after the date the affidavit is filed, place a copy of the affidavit in the inmate's file that is reviewed by a parole panel or the board.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 12.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 508.085. REPRESENTATION SUMMARY FORM. (a) A person required to register under Section 508.083 shall, for each calendar year in which the person represents an inmate, file a representation summary form with the division on a form prescribed by the division.

(b) The form must be filed not later than January 31 of the year succeeding the year for which the report is filed and must include a statement of:

(1) the registrant's full name and address;

(2) the registrant's normal business, business phone number, and business address;

(3) the full name of any former member or employee of the board or the Texas Board of Criminal Justice or any former employee of the department with whom the registrant:

(A) is associated;

(B) has a relationship as an employer or employee; or

(C) maintains a contractual relationship to provide services;

(4) the full name and institutional identification number of each inmate the registrant represented in the previous calendar year; and

(5) the amount of compensation the registrant has received for representing each inmate in the previous calendar year.

(c) A person who files a form under this section and for whom the information required for the form has changed shall, not later than the 10th day after the date the information changes, file a supplemental statement with the division indicating the change.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 12.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 508.086. CRIMINAL PENALTIES. (a) A former member or employee of the board or the Texas Board of Criminal Justice or a former employee of the department commits an offense if the former member or employee violates Section 508.083(b), (c), or (d).

(b) A person who represents an inmate for compensation commits an offense if the person is not an attorney licensed in this state.

(c) A person who is required to file an affidavit under Section 508.084(a) or (c) or a form or statement under Section 508.085 commits an offense if the person fails to file the affidavit, form, or statement.

(d) An offense under Subsection (a) is a Class A misdemeanor. An offense under Subsection (b) or (c) is a Class C misdemeanor.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 12.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

SUBCHAPTER D. PARDONS AND PAROLES DIVISION

Sec. 508.111. DIRECTOR. (a) The executive director shall hire the director of the division.

(b) The director is responsible for the administration of the division.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 12.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 508.112. DUTY OF DIVISION. The division is responsible for the investigation and supervision of all releasees.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 12.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 508.113. PAROLE OFFICERS, SUPERVISORS: QUALIFICATIONS. (a) This subsection and Subsection (b) apply only to a person employed as a parole officer or supervisor on or before September 1, 1990. A person may not be employed as a parole officer or supervisor, or be responsible for investigating or supervising a releasee, unless the person has:

(1) four years of successfully completed education in an accredited college or university;

(2) two years of full-time paid employment in responsible correctional work with adults or juveniles or in a related field; and

(3) any other qualifications that may be specified by the director.

(b) Additional experience in a category described by Subsection (a)(2) may be substituted year for year for the required college education, with a maximum substitution of two years.

(c) The director shall establish qualifications for parole officers and supervisors that are the same as qualifications for community supervision and corrections department officers imposed by Section 76.005. A person may not begin employment as a parole officer or supervisor after September 1, 1990, unless the person meets the qualifications established by the director.

(d) A person who is serving as a peace officer or as a prosecuting attorney may not act as a parole officer or be responsible for supervising a releasee.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 12.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 508.1131. SALARY CAREER LADDER FOR PAROLE OFFICERS. (a) The executive director shall adopt a salary career ladder for parole officers. The salary career ladder must base a parole officer's salary on the officer's classification and years of service with the department.

(b) For purposes of the salary schedule, the department shall classify all parole officer positions as Parole Officer I, Parole Officer II, Parole Officer III, Parole Officer IV, or Parole Officer V.

(c) Under the salary career ladder adopted under Subsection (a), a parole officer to whom the schedule applies and who received an overall evaluation of at least satisfactory in the officer's most recent annual evaluation is entitled to an annual salary increase, during each of the officer's first 10 years of service in a designated parole officer classification as described by Subsection (b), equal to one-tenth of the difference between:

(1) the officer's current annual salary; and

(2) the minimum annual salary of a parole officer in the next highest classification.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1308 (S.B. 909), Sec. 37, eff. June 15, 2007.

Sec. 508.114. PAROLE OFFICERS, SUPERVISORS: ADDITIONAL DUTIES. (a) The judge of a court having original jurisdiction of criminal actions may, with the approval of the director, designate a parole officer or supervisor as a community supervision and corrections department officer. The director must give prior written approval for the payment of a proportional part of the salary paid to the parole officer or supervisor in compensation for service as a community supervision and corrections department officer. The director shall periodically report to the governor and the legislature the proportional salary payments.

(b) A parole officer or supervisor, on request of the governor or on order of the director, shall be responsible for supervising an inmate placed on conditional pardon or granted an emergency absence under escort.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 12.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 508.1141. SPECIALIZED TRAINING; GANG MEMBERS. The department shall develop and provide specialized training for parole officers supervising releasees previously identified by the department as being members of prison gangs, criminal street gangs, or security threat groups.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 490, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 508.1142. PAROLE OFFICER MAXIMUM CASELOADS. (a) The department shall adopt a policy that establishes guidelines for a maximum caseload for each parole officer of:

(1) 60 active releasees, if the releasees are not in a specialized program described by Subdivisions (2)-(6);

(2) 35 active releasees, if the releasees are in the special needs offender program;

(3) 35 active releasees, if the releasees are in the therapeutic community substance abuse aftercare treatment program;

(4) 24 active releasees, if the releasees are in the sex offender program;

(5) 20 active releasees, if the releasees are electronically monitored; and

(6) 11 active releasees, if the releasees are in the super-intensive supervision program.

(b) If the department is unable to meet the maximum caseload guidelines, the department shall submit a report to the Legislative Budget Board, at the end of each fiscal year in which the department fails to meet the guidelines, stating the amount of money needed by the department to meet the guidelines.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1421 (H.B. 3736), Sec. 1, eff. June 15, 2007.

Sec. 508.115. NOTIFICATION OF RELEASE OF INMATE. (a) Not later than the 11th day before the date a parole panel orders the release on parole of an inmate or not later than the 11th day after the date the board recommends that the governor grant executive clemency, the division shall notify the sheriffs, each chief of police, the prosecuting attorneys, and the district judges in the county in which the inmate was convicted and the county to which the inmate is released that a parole panel is considering release on parole or the governor is considering clemency.

(b) In a case in which there was a change of venue, the division shall notify the sheriff, the prosecuting attorney, and the district judge in the county in which the prosecution was originated if, not later than the 30th day after the date the inmate was sentenced, those officials request in writing that the division give the officials notice under this section of a release of the inmate.

(c) Not later than the 10th day after the date a parole panel orders the transfer of an inmate to a halfway house under this chapter, the division shall give notice in accordance with Subsection (d) to:

(1) the sheriff of the county in which the inmate was convicted;

(2) the sheriff of the county in which the halfway house is located and each chief of police in the county; and

(3) the attorney who represents the state in the prosecution of felonies in the county in which the halfway house is located.

(d) The notice must state:

(1) the inmate's name;

(2) the county in which the inmate was convicted; and

(3) the offense for which the inmate was convicted.

(e) The notice must be provided by e-mail or other electronic communication.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 12.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 62, Sec. 10.19, eff. Sept. 1, 1999; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 856, Sec. 5, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1123 (H.B. 200), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 508.116. PAROLE INFORMATION PROGRAM. (a) The division shall develop and implement a comprehensive program to inform inmates, the inmates' families, and other interested parties about the parole process.

(b) The division shall update the program annually.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 12.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 508.117. VICTIM NOTIFICATION. (a) Before a parole panel considers for release on parole an inmate who is serving a sentence for an offense in which a person was a victim, the division, using the name and address provided on the victim impact statement, shall make a reasonable effort to notify:

(1) the victim;

(2) if the victim has a guardian, the guardian; or

(3) if the victim is deceased, a close relative of the deceased victim.

(b) A victim, guardian of a victim, or close relative of a deceased victim who would have been entitled to notification of parole consideration by the division but failed to provide a victim impact statement containing the person's name and address may file with the division a written request for notification. After receiving the written request, the division shall grant to the person all privileges, including notification under this section, to which the person would have been entitled had the person submitted a completed victim impact statement.

(c) If the notice is sent to a guardian or close relative of a deceased victim, the notice must contain a request by the division that the guardian or relative inform other persons having an interest in the matter that the inmate is being considered for release on parole.

(d) The failure of the division to comply with notice requirements of this section is not a ground for revocation of parole.

(e) Before an inmate is released from the institutional division on parole or to mandatory supervision, the pardons and paroles division shall give notice of the release to a person entitled to notification of parole consideration for the inmate under Subsection (a) or (b).

(f) Except as necessary to comply with this section, the board or the department may not disclose to any person the name or address of a person entitled to notice under this section unless:

(1) the person approves the disclosure; or

(2) a court determines that there is good cause for disclosure and orders the board or the department to disclose the information.

(g) In this section:

(1) "Close relative of a deceased victim" means a person who was:

(A) the spouse of the victim at the time of the victim's death;

(B) a parent of the deceased victim;

(C) an adult brother, sister, or child of the deceased victim; or

(D) the nearest relative of the deceased victim by consanguinity, if the persons described by Paragraphs (A) through (C) are deceased or are incapacitated due to physical or mental illness or infirmity.

(2) "Guardian of a victim" means a person who is the legal guardian of a victim, whether or not the legal relationship between the guardian and the victim exists because of the age of the victim or the physical or mental incompetency of the victim.

(2-a) "Sexual assault" includes an offense under Section 21.02, Penal Code.

(3) "Victim" means a person who:

(A) is a victim of sexual assault, kidnapping, aggravated robbery, or felony stalking; or

(B) has suffered bodily injury or death as the result of the criminal conduct of another.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 12.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 593 (H.B. 8), Sec. 3.39, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 826 (H.B. 309), Sec. 1, eff. June 15, 2007.

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1308 (S.B. 909), Sec. 38, eff. June 15, 2007.

Sec. 508.118. HALFWAY HOUSES. (a) The division, in conjunction with the institutional division, shall use halfway houses to divert from housing in regular units of the institutional division suitable low-risk inmates and other inmates who would benefit from a smoother transition from incarceration to supervised release.

(b) Before transferring an inmate to a halfway house, the division shall send to the director of the halfway house all information relating to the inmate that the division determines will aid the halfway house in helping the inmate make a transition from the institutional division to supervised release.

(c) The division is responsible for supervising an inmate:

(1) for whom a presumptive parole date has been established; and

(2) who is transferred into a preparole residence in a halfway house under Subchapter A, Chapter 499.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 12.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 508.119. COMMUNITY RESIDENTIAL FACILITIES. (a) The purpose of a community residential facility is to provide housing, supervision, counseling, personal, social, and work adjustment training, and other programs to:

(1) releasees who are required by a parole panel as a condition of release on parole or to mandatory supervision to serve a period in a community residential facility; and

(2) releasees whose parole or mandatory supervision has been continued or modified under Section 508.283 and on whom sanctions have been imposed under that section.

(b) The division may establish and operate, or contract for the operation of, community residential facilities.

(c) The division may contract with a public or private vendor for the financing, construction, operation, or management of a community residential facility using a lease-purchase or installment sale contract to provide or supplement housing, board, or supervision for releasees placed in a community residential facility. A releasee housed or supervised in a facility operated by a vendor under a contract is subject to the same laws as if the housing or supervision were provided directly by the division.

(d) Unless the division or a vendor proposing to operate a community residential facility provides notice of a following proposed action and a hearing on the issues in the same manner as required under Section 509.010, the division may not:

(1) establish or contract for a community residential facility;

(2) change the use of a community residential facility;

(3) significantly increase the capacity of a community residential facility; or

(4) increase the capacity of a community residential facility to more than 500 residents, regardless of whether the increase is significant.

(e) Subsection (d) applies to any residential facility that the division establishes or contracts for under:

(1) this chapter;

(2) Subchapter C, Chapter 497; or

(3) Subchapter A, Chapter 499.

(f) The Texas Board of Criminal Justice shall adopt rules necessary for the management of a community residential facility.

(g) The division may charge to a releasee housed in a community residential facility a reasonable fee for the cost of housing, board, and the part of the administrative costs of the facility that is properly allocable to the releasee. The fee may not exceed the actual costs to the division for services to that releasee. The division may not deny placement in a community residential facility to a releasee because the releasee is unable to pay the fee.

(h) A parole panel or a designated agent of the division may grant a limited release to a releasee placed in a community residential facility to maintain or seek employment or participation in an education or training course or to seek housing after release from the facility.

(i) The notice required by Subsection (d) must clearly state that the proposed action concerns a facility in which persons who have been released from prison on parole or to mandatory supervision are to be housed.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 12.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 62, Sec. 10.20, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

SUBCHAPTER E. PAROLE AND MANDATORY SUPERVISION; RELEASE PROCEDURES

Sec. 508.141. AUTHORITY TO CONSIDER AND ORDER RELEASE ON PAROLE. (a) A parole panel may consider for release and release on parole an inmate who:

(1) has been sentenced to a term of imprisonment in the institutional division;

(2) is confined in a penal or correctional institution, including a jail in this state, a federal correctional institution, or a jail or a correctional institution in another state; and

(3) is eligible for release on parole.

(b) A parole is issued only on the order of a parole panel.

(c) Before releasing an inmate on parole, a parole panel may have the inmate appear before the panel and interview the inmate.

(d) A parole panel may release an inmate on parole during the parole month established for the inmate if the panel determines that the inmate's release will not increase the likelihood of harm to the public.

(e) A parole panel may release an inmate on parole only when:

(1) arrangements have been made for the inmate's employment or for the inmate's maintenance and care, which may include the issuance of payment for the cost of temporary post-release housing under Section 508.157; and

(2) the parole panel believes that the inmate is able and willing to fulfill the obligations of a law-abiding citizen.

(f) A parole panel may order a parole only for the best interest of society and not as an award of clemency.

(g) The board shall adopt a policy establishing the date on which the board may reconsider for release an inmate who has previously been denied release. The policy must require the board to reconsider for release:

(1) an inmate serving a sentence for an offense listed in Section 508.149(a) or for an offense punishable as a felony of the second or third degree under Section 22.04, Penal Code, during a month designated under Subsection (g-1) by the parole panel that denied release; and

(2) an inmate other than an inmate described by Subdivision (1) as soon as practicable after the first anniversary of the date of the denial.

(g-1) The month designated under Subsection (g)(1) by the parole panel that denied release must begin after the first anniversary of the date of the denial and end before the fifth anniversary of the date of the denial, unless the inmate is serving a sentence for an offense under Section 22.021, Penal Code, or a life sentence for a capital felony, in which event the designated month must begin after the first anniversary of the date of the denial and end before the 10th anniversary of the date of the denial.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 12.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 349, Sec. 1, eff. June 18, 2003; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., 3rd C.S., ch. 3, Sec. 11.17, eff. Jan. 11, 2004.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 944 (H.B. 3226), Sec. 2, eff. June 19, 2009.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1256 (H.B. 431), Sec. 2, eff. June 14, 2013.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 358 (H.B. 1914), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 508.1411. NOTIFICATION OF PAROLE PANEL DECISION. (a) For each decision of a parole panel granting or denying the release of an inmate on parole, or denying the release of an inmate on mandatory supervision, the parole panel shall:

(1) produce a written statement, in clear and understandable language, that explains:

(A) the decision; and

(B) the reasons for the decision only to the extent those reasons relate specifically to the inmate;

(2) provide a copy of the statement to the inmate; and

(3) place a copy of the statement in the inmate's file.

(b) In a written statement produced under Subsection (a), the parole panel may withhold information that:

(1) is confidential and not subject to public disclosure under Chapter 552; or

(2) the parole panel considers to possibly jeopardize the health or safety of any individual.

(c) The board shall keep a copy of each statement produced under Subsection (a) in a central location.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1154 (S.B. 213), Sec. 14, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 508.142. PERIOD OF PAROLE. (a) The institutional division shall provide the board with sentence time credit information for each inmate who is eligible for release on parole.

(b) Good conduct time credit is computed for an inmate as if the inmate were confined in the institutional division during the entire time the inmate was actually confined.

(c) The period of parole is computed by subtracting from the term for which the inmate was sentenced the calendar time served on the sentence.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 12.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 508.143. LEGAL CUSTODY OF RELEASEE. (a) A releasee while on parole is in the legal custody of the division.

(b) A releasee while on mandatory supervision is in the legal custody of the state.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 12.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 508.144. PAROLE GUIDELINES AND RANGE OF RECOMMENDED PAROLE APPROVAL RATES. (a) The board shall:

(1) develop according to an acceptable research method the parole guidelines that are the basic criteria on which a parole decision is made;

(2) base the guidelines on the seriousness of the offense and the likelihood of a favorable parole outcome;

(3) ensure that the guidelines require consideration of an inmate's progress in any programs in which the inmate participated during the inmate's term of confinement;

(4) establish and maintain a range of recommended parole approval rates for each category or score within the guidelines; and

(5) implement the guidelines.

(b) The board shall meet annually to review and discuss the parole guidelines and range of recommended parole approval rates. The board may consult outside experts to assist with the review. The board shall prioritize the use of outside experts, technical assistance, and training in taking any action under Subsection (c). The board must consider:

(1) how the parole guidelines and range of recommended parole approval rates serve the needs of parole decision-making; and

(2) the extent to which the parole guidelines and range of recommended parole approval rates reflect parole panel decisions and predict successful parole outcomes.

(c) Based on the board's review under Subsection (b), the board may:

(1) update the guidelines by:

(A) including new risk factors; or

(B) changing the values of offense severity or risk factor scores; or

(2) modify the range of recommended parole approval rates under the guidelines, if parole approval rates differ significantly from the range of recommended parole approval rates.

(d) The board is not required to hold an open meeting to review the parole guidelines and range of recommended parole approval rates as required by Subsection (b), but any modifications or updates to the guidelines or range of recommended parole approval rates made by the board under Subsection (c) must occur in an open meeting.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 12.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., 3rd C.S., ch. 3, Sec. 11.18, eff. Jan. 11, 2004.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1308 (S.B. 909), Sec. 39, eff. June 15, 2007.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1154 (S.B. 213), Sec. 15, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 508.1445. ANNUAL REPORT ON GUIDELINES REQUIRED. (a) The board annually shall submit a report to the Criminal Justice Legislative Oversight Committee, the lieutenant governor, the speaker of the house of representatives, and the presiding officers of the standing committees in the senate and house of representatives primarily responsible for criminal justice regarding the board's application of the parole guidelines adopted under Section 508.144.

(b) The report must include:

(1) a brief explanation of the parole guidelines, including how the board:

(A) defines the risk factors and offense severity levels; and

(B) determines the range of recommended parole approval rates for each guideline score;

(2) a comparison of the range of recommended parole approval rates under the parole guidelines to the actual approval rates for individual parole panel members, regional offices, and the state as a whole; and

(3) a description of instances in which the actual parole approval rates do not meet the range of recommended parole approval rates under the parole guidelines, an explanation of the variations, and a list of actions that the board has taken or will take to meet the guidelines.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1308 (S.B. 909), Sec. 40, eff. June 15, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1154 (S.B. 213), Sec. 16, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 508.145. ELIGIBILITY FOR RELEASE ON PAROLE; COMPUTATION OF PAROLE ELIGIBILITY DATE. (a) An inmate is not eligible for release on parole if the inmate is under sentence of death, serving a sentence of life imprisonment without parole, or serving a sentence for any of the following offenses under the Penal Code:

(1) Section 20A.03, if the offense is based partly or wholly on conduct constituting an offense under Section 20A.02(a)(5), (6), (7), or (8);

(2) Section 21.02;

(3) Section 22.021, if the offense is punishable under Subsection (f) of that section; or

(4) Section 51.03 or 51.04.

(b) An inmate serving a life sentence under Section 12.31(a)(1), Penal Code, for a capital felony is not eligible for release on parole until the actual calendar time the inmate has served, without consideration of good conduct time, equals 40 calendar years.

(c) An inmate serving a sentence under Section 12.42(c)(2), Penal Code, is not eligible for release on parole until the actual calendar time the inmate has served, without consideration of good conduct time, equals 35 calendar years.

(c-1)(1) Except as provided by Subdivision (2), an inmate serving a sentence for an offense under Section 20A.02(a)(5), (6), (7), or (8), Penal Code, is not eligible for release on parole.

(2) An inmate serving a sentence for an offense described by Subdivision (1) for which the judgment in the case contains an affirmative finding under Article 42.01991, Code of Criminal Procedure, is not eligible for release on parole until the inmate's actual calendar time served, without consideration of good conduct time, equals one-half of the sentence or 30 calendar years, whichever is less, but in no event is the inmate eligible for release on parole in less than two calendar years.

(d)(1) This subsection applies only to an inmate who is serving a sentence for:

(A) an offense described by Article 42A.054(a), Code of Criminal Procedure, other than an offense under Section 19.03, Penal Code, or an offense under Chapter 20A, Penal Code, that is described by Subsection (a)(1) or (c-1)(1);

(B) an offense for which the judgment contains an affirmative finding under Article 42A.054(c) or (d), Code of Criminal Procedure; or

(C) an offense under Section 71.02 or 71.023, Penal Code.

(2) An inmate described by Subdivision (1) is not eligible for release on parole until the inmate's actual calendar time served, without consideration of good conduct time, equals one-half of the sentence or 30 calendar years, whichever is less, but in no event is the inmate eligible for release on parole in less than two calendar years.

(3) Notwithstanding Subdivision (2), an inmate who is serving a sentence for an offense under Section 22.021, Penal Code, is not eligible for release on parole if the inmate is serving a sentence for an offense for which punishment was enhanced under Section 12.42(c)(4), Penal Code.

(d-1) Notwithstanding Subsection (d), for every 12 months that elapse between the date an arrest warrant is issued for the inmate following an indictment for the offense and the date the inmate is arrested for the offense, the earliest date on which an inmate is eligible for parole is delayed by three years from the date otherwise provided by Subsection (d), if the inmate is serving a sentence for an offense under Section 19.02, 22.011, or 22.021, Penal Code.

(e) An inmate serving a sentence for which the punishment is increased under Section 481.134, Health and Safety Code, is not eligible for release on parole until the inmate's actual calendar time served, without consideration of good conduct time, equals five years or the term to which the inmate was sentenced, whichever is less.

(f) Except as provided by Section 508.146, any other inmate is eligible for release on parole when the inmate's actual calendar time served plus good conduct time equals one-fourth of the sentence imposed or 15 years, whichever is less.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 12.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 62, Sec. 10.21, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 787 (S.B. 60), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 787 (S.B. 60), Sec. 12, eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 405 (S.B. 877), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 593 (H.B. 8), Sec. 1.10, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 146 (S.B. 1832), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (S.B. 839), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1400 (H.B. 221), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 122 (H.B. 3000), Sec. 10, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1119 (H.B. 3), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 126 (S.B. 727), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1252 (H.B. 8), Sec. 13, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1325 (S.B. 549), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 770 (H.B. 2299), Sec. 2.51, eff. January 1, 2017.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 632 (H.B. 465), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2021.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 632 (H.B. 465), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2021.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., 4th C.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 4), Sec. 6, eff. March 5, 2024.

Sec. 508.1455. EARLY RELEASE ON PAROLE FOR CERTAIN INMATES REQUIRED TO PARTICIPATE IN EDUCATIONAL AND VOCATIONAL TRAINING PILOT PROGRAM. (a) This section applies only to an inmate:

(1) who is serving a sentence for an offense under Chapter 481, Health and Safety Code, that is punishable as a felony of the third degree;

(2) who has not previously been convicted of a felony under Title 5, Penal Code, or under Chapter 43 or 71 of that code; and

(3) whose eligibility for parole is computed under Section 508.145(f).

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, a parole panel may release on parole an inmate described by Subsection (a) approximately 180 days before the date the inmate would be eligible for release on parole under Section 508.145(f).

(c) A parole panel releasing an inmate on parole under this section shall require as a condition of release on parole that the inmate participate in a program operated under Section 493.034, to begin immediately following the inmate's release on parole.

(d) For purpose of consideration by a parole panel for early release on parole under Subsection (b), the department shall annually identify not fewer than 100 inmates described by Subsection (a) who are suitable candidates for participation in a program operated under Section 493.034. The board and the department shall jointly adopt rules for identifying inmates under this subsection. The rules must require the board or the department to notify an inmate that the inmate is being considered for release on parole under this section.

(e) The board shall adopt rules governing the release of an inmate on parole under this section.

(f) An inmate who is considered for but not granted release on parole under this section shall be considered for release on parole on the date that the inmate otherwise would have been considered for release on parole under this chapter.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1014 (H.B. 2352), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 508.146. MEDICALLY RECOMMENDED INTENSIVE SUPERVISION. (a) An inmate other than an inmate who is serving a sentence of death or life without parole may be released on medically recommended intensive supervision on a date designated by a parole panel described by Subsection (e), except that an inmate with an instant offense that is an offense described in Article 42A.054, Code of Criminal Procedure, or an inmate who has a reportable conviction or adjudication under Chapter 62, Code of Criminal Procedure, may only be considered if a medical condition of terminal illness or long-term care has been diagnosed by a physician, if:

(1) the Texas Correctional Office on Offenders with Medical or Mental Impairments, in cooperation with the Correctional Managed Health Care Committee, identifies the inmate as being:

(A) a person who is elderly or terminally ill, a person with mental illness, an intellectual disability, or a physical disability, or a person who has a condition requiring long-term care, if the inmate is an inmate with an instant offense that is described in Article 42A.054, Code of Criminal Procedure; or

(B) in a persistent vegetative state or being a person with an organic brain syndrome with significant to total mobility impairment, if the inmate is an inmate who has a reportable conviction or adjudication under Chapter 62, Code of Criminal Procedure;

(2) the parole panel determines that, based on the inmate's condition and a medical evaluation, the inmate does not constitute a threat to public safety; and

(3) the Texas Correctional Office on Offenders with Medical or Mental Impairments, in cooperation with the pardons and paroles division, has prepared for the inmate a medically recommended intensive supervision plan that requires the inmate to submit to electronic monitoring, places the inmate on super-intensive supervision, or otherwise ensures appropriate supervision of the inmate.

(b) An inmate may be released on medically recommended intensive supervision only if the inmate's medically recommended intensive supervision plan under Subsection (a)(3) is approved by the Texas Correctional Office on Offenders with Medical or Mental Impairments.

(c) The parole panel shall require as a condition of release under Subsection (a) that the releasee remain under the care of a physician and in a medically suitable placement. At least once each calendar quarter, the Texas Correctional Office on Offenders with Medical or Mental Impairments shall report to the parole panel on the releasee's medical and placement status. On the basis of the report, the parole panel may modify conditions of release and impose any condition on the releasee that a panel could impose on a releasee released under Section 508.145, including a condition that the releasee reside in a halfway house or community residential facility.

(d) The Texas Correctional Office on Offenders with Medical or Mental Impairments and the Texas Department of Human Services shall jointly request proposals from public or private vendors to provide under contract services for inmates released on medically recommended intensive supervision. A request for proposals under this subsection may require that the services be provided in a medical care facility located in an urban area. For the purposes of this subsection, "urban area" means the area in this state within a metropolitan statistical area, according to the standards of the United States Bureau of the Census.

(e) Only parole panels composed of the presiding officer of the board and two members appointed to the panel by the presiding officer may make determinations regarding the release of inmates on medically recommended intensive supervision under Subsection (a) or of inmates released pending deportation. If the Texas Council on Offenders with Mental Impairments identifies an inmate as a candidate for release under the guidelines established by Subsection (a)(1), the council shall present to a parole panel described by this subsection relevant information concerning the inmate and the inmate's potential for release under this section.

(f) An inmate who is not a citizen of the United States, as defined by federal law, who is not under a sentence of death or life without parole, and who does not have a reportable conviction or adjudication under Chapter 62, Code of Criminal Procedure, or an instant offense described in Article 42A.054, Code of Criminal Procedure, may be released to immigration authorities pending deportation on a date designated by a parole panel described by Subsection (e) if the parole panel determines that on release the inmate would be deported to another country and that the inmate does not constitute a threat to public safety in the other country or this country and is unlikely to reenter this country illegally.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 12.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1435, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 252, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2003; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 856, Sec. 21, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 787 (S.B. 60), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1247 (H.B. 2611), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 770 (H.B. 2299), Sec. 2.52, eff. January 1, 2017.

Sec. 508.147. RELEASE TO MANDATORY SUPERVISION. (a) Except as provided by Section 508.149, a parole panel shall order the release of an inmate who is not on parole to mandatory supervision when the actual calendar time the inmate has served plus any accrued good conduct time equals the term to which the inmate was sentenced.

(b) An inmate released to mandatory supervision is considered to be released on parole.

(c) To the extent practicable, arrangements for the inmate's proper employment, maintenance, and care must be made before the inmate's release to mandatory supervision.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 12.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 508.1471. RELEASE TO MANDATORY SUPERVISION OF CERTAIN INMATES CONFINED IN COUNTY JAIL. (a) This section applies only to an inmate who, at the time the inmate is sentenced to a term of imprisonment in the department, is:

(1) confined in a county jail; and

(2) eligible for immediate release to mandatory supervision.

(b) Before an inmate is released from a county jail to mandatory supervision, the department shall provide notice to a victim, guardian of a victim, or close relative of a deceased victim that the inmate is eligible for release to mandatory supervision. The notice must be sent to the address provided in the victim impact statement or submitted under Section 508.117(b) and must state that the victim, guardian, or close relative may submit, not later than the 14th day after the date of the notice, a written statement to the parole panel considering the inmate's release regarding:

(1) the offense;

(2) the inmate; and

(3) the effect of the offense on the victim, guardian, or close relative.

(c) Notwithstanding any other law, the parole panel may interview a victim, guardian of a victim, or close relative of a deceased victim regarding the release of the inmate to mandatory supervision.

(d) In this section, "victim," "guardian of a victim," and "close relative of a deceased victim" have the meanings assigned by Section 508.117.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 636 (H.B. 721), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 508.148. PERIOD OF MANDATORY SUPERVISION. (a) The period of mandatory supervision is computed by subtracting from the term for which the inmate was sentenced the calendar time served on the sentence.

(b) The time served on mandatory supervision is computed as calendar time.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 12.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 508.149. INMATES INELIGIBLE FOR MANDATORY SUPERVISION. (a) An inmate may not be released to mandatory supervision if the inmate is serving a sentence for or has been previously convicted of:

(1) an offense for which the judgment contains an affirmative finding under Article 42A.054(c) or (d), Code of Criminal Procedure;

(2) a first degree felony or a second degree felony under Section 19.02, Penal Code;

(3) a capital felony under Section 19.03, Penal Code;

(4) a first degree felony or a second degree felony under Section 20.04, Penal Code;

(5) an offense under Section 21.11, Penal Code;

(6) a felony under Section 22.011, Penal Code;

(7) a first degree felony or a second degree felony under Section 22.02, Penal Code;

(8) a first degree felony under Section 22.021, Penal Code;

(9) a first degree felony under Section 22.04, Penal Code;

(10) a first degree felony under Section 28.02, Penal Code;

(11) a second degree felony under Section 29.02, Penal Code;

(12) a first degree felony under Section 29.03, Penal Code;

(13) a first degree felony under Section 30.02, Penal Code;

(14) a felony for which the punishment is increased under Section 481.134 or 481.140, Health and Safety Code;

(15) an offense under Section 43.25, Penal Code;

(16) an offense under Section 21.02, Penal Code;

(17) a first degree felony under Section 15.03, Penal Code;

(18) an offense under Section 43.05, Penal Code;

(19) an offense under Section 20A.02, Penal Code;

(20) an offense under Section 20A.03, Penal Code;

(21) a first degree felony under Section 71.02 or 71.023, Penal Code;

(22) an offense under Section 481.1123, Health and Safety Code, punished under Subsection (d), (e), or (f) of that section;

(23) a second degree felony under Section 22.01, Penal Code; or

(24) an offense under Section 22.01, Penal Code, punished under Subsection (b)(2), (7), or (8) of that section.

(a-1) An inmate serving a sentence for an offense under Section 51.03 or 51.04, Penal Code, may not be released to mandatory supervision.

(b) An inmate may not be released to mandatory supervision if a parole panel determines that:

(1) the inmate's accrued good conduct time is not an accurate reflection of the inmate's potential for rehabilitation; and

(2) the inmate's release would endanger the public.

(c) A parole panel that makes a determination under Subsection (b) shall specify in writing the reasons for the determination.

(d) A determination under Subsection (b) is not subject to administrative or judicial review, except that the parole panel making the determination shall reconsider the inmate for release to mandatory supervision at least twice during the two years after the date of the determination.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 12.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 62, Sec. 10.22, eff. Sept. 1, 1999; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 786, Sec. 3, eff. June 14, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 593 (H.B. 8), Sec. 1.11, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 146 (S.B. 1832), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 24), Sec. 5.02, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 122 (H.B. 3000), Sec. 11, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 9.011, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1325 (S.B. 549), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 770 (H.B. 2299), Sec. 2.53, eff. January 1, 2017.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 584 (S.B. 768), Sec. 16, eff. September 1, 2021.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 692 (H.B. 1577), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., 4th C.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 4), Sec. 7, eff. March 5, 2024.

Sec. 508.150. CONSECUTIVE FELONY SENTENCES. (a) If an inmate is sentenced to consecutive felony sentences under Article 42.08, Code of Criminal Procedure, a parole panel shall designate during each sentence the date, if any, the inmate would have been eligible for release on parole if the inmate had been sentenced to serve a single sentence.

(b) For the purposes of Article 42.08, Code of Criminal Procedure, the judgment and sentence of an inmate sentenced for a felony, other than the last sentence in a series of consecutive sentences, cease to operate:

(1) when the actual calendar time served by the inmate equals the sentence imposed by the court; or

(2) on the date a parole panel designates as the date the inmate would have been eligible for release on parole if the inmate had been sentenced to serve a single sentence.

(c) A parole panel may not:

(1) consider consecutive sentences as a single sentence for purposes of parole; or

(2) release on parole an inmate sentenced to serve consecutive felony sentences before the date the inmate becomes eligible for release on parole from the last sentence imposed on the inmate.

(d) A parole panel may not use calendar time served and good conduct time accrued by an inmate that are used by the panel in determining when a judgment and sentence cease to operate:

(1) for the same purpose in determining that date in a subsequent sentence in the same series of consecutive sentences; or

(2) for determining the date an inmate becomes eligible for release on parole from the last sentence in a series of consecutive sentences.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 12.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 508.151. PRESUMPTIVE PAROLE DATE. (a) For the purpose of diverting inmates to halfway houses under Section 508.118, a parole panel, after reviewing all available pertinent information, may designate a presumptive parole date for an inmate who:

(1) has never been convicted of an offense listed under Article 42A.054(a), Code of Criminal Procedure, or an offense under Section 21.02, Penal Code; and

(2) has never had a conviction with a judgment that contains an affirmative finding under Article 42A.054(c) or (d), Code of Criminal Procedure.

(b) The presumptive parole date may not be a date that is earlier than the inmate's initial parole eligibility date computed under Section 508.145.

(c) A parole panel may rescind or postpone a previously established presumptive parole date on the basis of a report from an agent of the division responsible for supervision or an agent of the institutional division acting in the case.

(d) If an inmate transferred to preparole status has satisfactorily served the inmate's sentence in the halfway house to which the inmate is assigned from the date of transfer to the presumptive parole date, without rescission or postponement of the date, the parole panel shall order the inmate's release on parole and issue an appropriate certificate of release. The releasee is subject to the provisions of this chapter governing release on parole.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 12.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 593 (H.B. 8), Sec. 3.40, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 122 (H.B. 3000), Sec. 12, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 770 (H.B. 2299), Sec. 2.54, eff. January 1, 2017.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 768 (H.B. 4595), Sec. 10.007, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 508.152. INDIVIDUAL TREATMENT PLAN. (a) Not later than the 120th day after the date an inmate is admitted to the institutional division, the department shall obtain all pertinent information relating to the inmate, including:

(1) the court judgment;

(2) any sentencing report;

(3) the circumstances of the inmate's offense;

(4) the inmate's previous social history and criminal record;

(5) the inmate's physical and mental health record;

(6) a record of the inmate's conduct, employment history, and attitude in the institutional division; and

(7) any written comments or information provided by local trial officials or victims of the offense.

(b) The department shall:

(1) establish for the inmate an individual treatment plan; and

(2) submit the plan to the board at the time of the board's consideration of the inmate's case for release.

(b-1) The department shall include in an inmate's individual treatment plan:

(1) a record of the inmate's institutional progress that includes the inmate's participation in any program, including an intensive volunteer program as defined by the department;

(2) the results of any assessment of the inmate, including any assessment made using the risk and needs assessment instrument adopted under Section 501.0921 and any vocational, educational, or substance abuse assessment;

(3) the dates on which the inmate must participate in any subsequent assessment; and

(4) all of the treatment and programming needs of the inmate, prioritized based on the inmate's assessed needs.

(b-2) At least once in every 12-month period, the department shall review each inmate's individual treatment plan to assess the inmate's institutional progress and revise or update the plan as necessary. The department shall make reasonable efforts to provide an inmate the opportunity to complete any classes or programs included in the inmate's individual treatment plan, other than classes or programs that are to be completed immediately before the inmate's release on parole, in a timely manner so that the inmate's release on parole is not delayed due to any uncompleted classes or programs.

(c) The board shall conduct an initial review of an eligible inmate not later than the 180th day after the date of the inmate's admission to the institutional division. The board shall identify any classes or programs that the board intends to require the inmate to complete before releasing the inmate on parole. The department shall provide the inmate with a list of those classes or programs.

(d) Before the inmate is approved for release on parole, the inmate must agree to participate in the programs and activities described by the individual treatment plan.

(e) The institutional division shall:

(1) work closely with the board to monitor the progress of the inmate in the institutional division; and

(2) report the progress to the board before the inmate's release.

(f) An attorney representing the state in the prosecution of an inmate serving a sentence for an offense described by Section 508.187(a) shall provide written comments to the department on the circumstances related to the commission of the offense and other information determined by the attorney to be relevant to any subsequent parole decisions regarding the inmate.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 12.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 978, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1154 (S.B. 213), Sec. 17, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1154 (S.B. 213), Sec. 18, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 505 (H.B. 2888), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 508.153. STATEMENTS OF VICTIM. (a) A parole panel considering for release on parole or mandatory supervision an inmate who is serving a sentence for an offense in which a person was a victim shall allow:

(1) the victim, a guardian of the victim, a close relative of the deceased victim, or a representative of the victim, the victim's guardian, or the victim's close relative to provide a written statement to the panel; and

(2) the victim, guardian of the victim, or close relative of the deceased victim to appear in person before the board members to present a statement of the person's views about:

(A) the offense;

(B) the inmate; and

(C) the effect of the offense on the victim.

(b) If more than one person is entitled to appear in person before the board members or parole commissioners, only the person chosen by all persons entitled to appear as the persons' sole representative may appear.

(c) The panel shall consider the statements and the information provided in a victim impact statement in determining whether to recommend an inmate for release on parole.

(d) This section does not limit the number of persons who may provide written statements for or against the release of the inmate on parole.

(e) In this section:

(1) "Close relative of a deceased victim" means a person who, regardless of whether the victim's death was related to the offense committed, was:

(A) the spouse of the victim at the time of the victim's death;

(B) a parent of the deceased victim;

(C) an adult brother, sister, or child of the deceased victim; or

(D) the nearest relative of the deceased victim by consanguinity, if the persons described by Paragraphs (A) through (C) are deceased or are incapacitated due to physical or mental illness or infirmity.

(2) "Guardian of a victim" and "victim" have the meanings assigned by Section 508.117.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 12.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 856, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 2001; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., 3rd C.S., ch. 3, Sec. 11.19, eff. Jan. 11, 2004.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 471 (H.B. 517), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 508.1531. CONTACT WITH VICTIM. A parole panel considering the release of an inmate on parole or to mandatory supervision may consider whether the inmate violated a policy adopted by the department under Section 498.0042(a) or a court order entered under Article 42.24, Code of Criminal Procedure.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 491 (H.B. 1028), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 508.154. CONTRACT ON RELEASE. (a) An inmate to be released on parole shall be furnished a contract stating in clear and intelligible language the conditions and rules of parole.

(b) Acceptance, signing, and execution of the contract by the inmate to be paroled is a precondition to release on parole.

(c) An inmate released to mandatory supervision shall be furnished a written statement stating in clear and intelligible language the conditions and rules of mandatory supervision.

(d) A releasee while on parole or mandatory supervision must be amenable to the conditions of supervision ordered by a parole panel.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 12.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 508.155. COMPLETION OF PAROLE PERIOD. (a) To complete a parole period, a releasee must serve the entire period of parole.

(b) The time on parole is computed as calendar time.

(c) The division may allow a releasee to serve the remainder of the releasee's sentence without supervision and without being required to report if a parole supervisor at the regional level has approved the releasee's early release from supervision under Section 508.1555.

(d) The division may require a person released from supervision and reporting under Subsection (c) to resubmit to supervision and resume reporting at any time and for any reason.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 12.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1308 (S.B. 909), Sec. 41, eff. June 15, 2007.

Sec. 508.1555. PROCEDURE FOR THE EARLY RELEASE FROM SUPERVISION OF CERTAIN RELEASEES. (a) A parole officer annually shall identify the releasees under the parole officer's supervision who are eligible for early release from supervision under Section 508.155(c). A releasee is eligible for early release if:

(1) the releasee has been under supervision for at least one-half of the time that remained on the releasee's sentence when the releasee was released from imprisonment;

(2) during the preceding two-year period, the releasee has not committed any violation of the rules or conditions of release;

(3) during the period of supervision the releasee's parole or release to mandatory supervision has not been revoked; and

(4) the division determines:

(A) that the releasee has made a good faith effort to comply with any restitution order imposed on the releasee by a court; and

(B) that allowing the releasee to serve the remainder of the releasee's sentence without supervision and reporting is in the best interest of society.

(b) After identifying any releasees who are eligible for early release under Subsection (a), the parole officer shall review the eligible releasees, including any releasees the parole officer has previously declined to recommend for early release, to determine if a recommendation for early release from supervision is appropriate. In conducting the review and determining recommendations, the parole officer shall consider whether the releasee:

(1) has a low risk of recidivism as determined by an assessment developed by the department; and

(2) has made a good faith effort to comply with the conditions of release.

(c) A parole officer shall forward to the parole supervisor at the regional level any recommendations for early release the parole officer makes under Subsection (b). If the parole supervisor approves the recommendation, the division shall allow a releasee to serve the remainder of the releasee's sentence without supervision and without being required to report as authorized by Section 508.155.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1308 (S.B. 909), Sec. 42, eff. June 15, 2007.

Sec. 508.156. DETERMINATE SENTENCE PAROLE. (a) Before the release of a person who is transferred under Section 152.0016(g), 152.00161(e), 245.051(c), or 245.151(e), Human Resources Code, to the department for release on parole, a parole panel shall review the person's records and may interview the person or any other person the panel considers necessary to determine the conditions of parole. The panel may impose any reasonable condition of parole on the person that the panel may impose on an adult inmate under this chapter.

(b) The panel shall furnish the person with a written statement clearly describing the conditions and rules of parole. The person must accept and sign the statement as a precondition to release on parole.

(c) While on parole, the person remains in the legal custody of the state and shall comply with the conditions of parole ordered by a panel under this section.

(d) The period of parole for a person released on parole under this section is the term for which the person was sentenced less calendar time served at the Texas Juvenile Justice Department or in the custody of a juvenile board or local juvenile probation department following a commitment under Section 54.04011(c)(2), Family Code, and in a juvenile detention facility in connection with the conduct for which the person was adjudicated.

(e) If a parole panel revokes the person's parole, the panel may require the person to serve the remaining portion of the person's sentence in the institutional division. The remaining portion of the person's sentence is computed without credit for the time from the date of the person's release to the date of revocation. The panel may not recommit the person to the Texas Juvenile Justice Department or to the custody of a juvenile board or local juvenile probation department.

(f) For purposes of this chapter, a person released from the Texas Juvenile Justice Department or the custody of a juvenile board or local juvenile probation department on parole under this section is considered to have been convicted of the offense for which the person has been adjudicated.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 12.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 263 (S.B. 103), Sec. 19, eff. June 8, 2007.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 85 (S.B. 653), Sec. 3.014, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 734 (H.B. 1549), Sec. 101, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 854 (S.B. 1149), Sec. 7, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 508.157. TEMPORARY HOUSING ON RELEASE. (a) This section applies only to inmates who are eligible for release on parole or to mandatory supervision and to releasees.

(a-1) In this section, "residential correctional facility" means a facility operated by or under contract with the department to provide housing, supervision, and programmatic support to individuals released on parole or to mandatory supervision. The term includes a halfway house described by Section 508.118 or a community residential facility described by Section 508.119. The term does not include a transitional treatment center, a substance abuse felony punishment facility, or any other facility operated by or under contract with the department the primary purpose of which is to provide substance abuse treatment or aftercare.

(b) If the department does not operate or contract for the operation of a residential correctional facility in the county of legal residence of an inmate or releasee, the department may issue, for an inmate described by Subsection (a) or for a releasee, payment for the cost of temporary post-release housing that:

(1) meets any conditions or requirements imposed by a parole panel;

(2) is located in the county of legal residence of the inmate or releasee; and

(3) except as provided by Subsection (e-1), is in a structure that existed on June 1, 2009, as a multifamily residence or as a motel to which Section 156.001, Tax Code, applies.

(c) The amount of payment issued under Subsection (b) may not exceed an amount that is equal to the cost the department would incur, for the period for which the payment is issued, to:

(1) incarcerate the inmate or releasee in a facility operated by or under contract with the department; or

(2) house the inmate or releasee in a residential correctional facility.

(d) The department shall issue payment under Subsection (b) out of funds appropriated by the legislature to the department for use in administering the parole system with respect to the housing of inmates on their release.

(e) The executive director of the Texas Department of Criminal Justice shall adopt rules as necessary to implement this section.

(e-1) The department may issue payment for post-release housing under Subsection (b) for a structure not described by Subsection (b)(3) if, before issuing payment, the department or the owner of the structure provides, in the same manner as required for a community corrections facility under Section 509.010, notice of the proposed use of the structure under this section and a hearing on the issue of whether the use is appropriate.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 944 (H.B. 3226), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2009.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 286 (H.B. 1770), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2011.

SUBCHAPTER E-1. ALTERNATIVE HOUSING IN CERTAIN COUNTIES

Sec. 508.171. APPLICABILITY. This subchapter applies only with respect to alternative housing that is located in a county with a population of 3.3 million or more.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 462 (H.B. 954), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 508.172. ALTERNATIVE HOUSING PROGRAM. The department shall require that an applicant to participate as a provider in a program designed to provide alternative housing for two or more unrelated releasees submit with the application, in the manner specified by the department, a permit or other documentation showing that the proposed alternative housing facility is in compliance with all applicable municipal and county regulations.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 462 (H.B. 954), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 508.173. INFORMATION REGARDING ALTERNATIVE HOUSING; NOTICE TO POLITICAL SUBDIVISION. (a) The department shall maintain the following information regarding releasees:

(1) a list of facilities providing alternative housing to two or more unrelated releasees, including:

(A) the name, address, and telephone number of the facility;

(B) the county in which the facility is located;

(C) information regarding whether the facility is in compliance with all applicable municipal and county regulations;

(D) the number of releasees residing at the facility; and

(E) the maximum capacity of the facility; and

(2) a list of releasees being housed at a facility described by Subdivision (1), including:

(A) the releasee's name;

(B) the county in which the releasee is required to reside under Section 508.181;

(C) the county in which the releasee committed the offense for which the releasee is on parole or mandatory supervision;

(D) the alternative housing facility in which the releasee resides; and

(E) the date on which the releasee began residing at the facility.

(b) On request of a county or municipality, the department shall provide monthly the information maintained by the department under Subsection (a). A county or municipality shall notify the department if the county or municipality does not want to continue to receive the information.

(c) The department shall provide the information to a county or municipality under Subsection (b) by secured electronic mail and in a machine-readable format.

(d) On request by a member of the legislature, the department shall provide the information maintained by the department under Subsection (a) to the member.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 462 (H.B. 954), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2021.

SUBCHAPTER F. MANDATORY CONDITIONS OF PAROLE OR MANDATORY SUPERVISION

Sec. 508.181. RESIDENCE DURING RELEASE. (a) Except as provided by Subsections (b) and (c), a parole panel shall require as a condition of parole or mandatory supervision that the releasee reside in the county in which:

(1) the releasee resided at the time of committing the offense for which the releasee was sentenced to the institutional division; or

(2) the releasee committed the offense for which the releasee was sentenced to the institutional division, if the releasee was not a resident of this state at the time of committing the offense.

(b) A parole panel may require a releasee to reside in a county other than the county required under Subsection (a) to:

(1) protect the life or safety of:

(A) a victim of the releasee's offense;

(B) the releasee;

(C) a witness in the case; or

(D) any other person; or

(2) increase the likelihood of the releasee's successful completion of parole or mandatory supervision, because of:

(A) written expressions of significant public concern in the county in which the releasee would otherwise be required to reside;

(B) the presence of family members or friends in the other county who have expressed a willingness to assist the releasee in successfully completing the conditions of the releasee's parole or mandatory supervision;

(C) the verified existence of a job offer in the other county; or

(D) the availability of a treatment program, educational program, or other social service program in the other county that is not available in the county in which the releasee is otherwise required to reside under Subsection (a).

(c) At any time after a releasee is released on parole or to mandatory supervision, a parole panel may modify the conditions of parole or mandatory supervision to require the releasee to reside in a county other than the county required by the original conditions. In making a decision under this subsection, a parole panel must consider the factors listed under Subsection (b).

(d) If a parole panel initially requires the releasee to reside in a county other than the county required under Subsection (a), the parole panel shall subsequently require the releasee to reside in the county described under Subsection (a) if the requirement that the releasee reside in the other county was based on:

(1) the verified existence of a job offer under Subsection (b)(2)(C) and the releasee is no longer employed or actively seeking employment; or

(2) the availability of a treatment program, educational program, or other social service program under Subsection (b)(2)(D) and the releasee:

(A) no longer regularly participates in the program as required by a condition of parole or mandatory supervision; or

(B) has successfully completed the program but has violated another condition of the releasee's parole or mandatory supervision.

(e) If a parole panel requires the releasee to reside in a county other than the county required under Subsection (a), the panel shall:

(1) state in writing the reason for the panel's decision; and

(2) place the statement in the releasee's permanent record.

(f) This section does not apply to a decision by a parole panel to require a releasee to serve the period of parole or mandatory supervision in another state.

(g) The division shall, on the first working day of each month, notify the sheriff of any county in which the total number of sex offenders under the supervision and control of the division residing in the county exceeds 10 percent of the total number of sex offenders in the state under the supervision and control of the division. The notice must be provided by e-mail or other electronic communication. If the total number of sex offenders under the supervision and control of the division residing in a county exceeds 22 percent of the total number of sex offenders in the state under the supervision and control of the division, a parole panel may require a sex offender to reside in that county only as required by Subsection (a) or for the reason stated in Subsection (b)(2)(B). In this subsection, "sex offender" means a person who is released on parole or to mandatory supervision after serving a sentence for an offense described by Section 508.187(a).

(h) If a parole panel requires a releasee to reside in a county other than the county required under Subsection (a), the division shall include the reason for residency exemption in the required notification to the sheriff of the county in which the defendant is to reside, the chief of police of the municipality in which the halfway house is located, and the attorney who represents the state in the prosecution of felonies in that county.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 12.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 62, Sec. 10.23, 10.24, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1123 (H.B. 200), Sec. 6, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 508.182. PAROLE SUPERVISION FEE; ADMINISTRATIVE FEE. (a) A parole panel shall require as a condition of parole or mandatory supervision that a releasee pay to the division for each month during which the releasee is under parole supervision:

(1) a parole supervision fee of $10; and

(2) an administrative fee of $8.

(b) A fee under this section applies to an inmate released in another state who is required as a condition of the inmate's release to report to a parole officer or supervisor in this state for parole supervision.

(c) On the request of the releasee, a parole panel may allow the releasee to defer one or more payments under this section. The releasee remains responsible for payment of the fee and shall pay the amount of the deferred payment not later than the second anniversary of the date the payment becomes due.

(d) The Texas Board of Criminal Justice shall adopt rules relating to the method of payment required of the releasee.

(e) The division shall remit fees collected under this section to the comptroller. The comptroller shall deposit the fees collected under:

(1) Subsection (a)(1) in the general revenue fund; and

(2) Subsection (a)(2) in the compensation to victims of crime fund.

(f) In a parole or mandatory supervision revocation hearing under Section 508.281 at which it is alleged only that the releasee failed to make a payment under this section, it is an affirmative defense to revocation that the releasee is unable to pay the amount as ordered by a parole panel. The releasee must prove the affirmative defense by a preponderance of the evidence.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 12.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 508.183. EDUCATIONAL SKILL LEVEL. (a) A parole panel shall require as a condition of release on parole or release to mandatory supervision that an inmate demonstrate to the parole panel whether the inmate has an educational skill level that is equal to or greater than the average skill level of students who have completed the sixth grade in a public school in this state.

(b) If the parole panel determines that the inmate has not attained that skill level, the parole panel shall require as a condition of parole or mandatory supervision that the inmate as a releasee attain that level of educational skill, unless the parole panel determines that the inmate lacks the intellectual capacity or the learning ability to ever achieve that level of skill.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 12.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 508.184. CONTROLLED SUBSTANCE TESTING. (a) A parole panel shall require as a condition of parole or mandatory supervision that a releasee submit to testing for controlled substances on evidence that:

(1) a controlled substance is present in the releasee's body;

(2) the releasee has used a controlled substance; or

(3) the use of a controlled substance is related to the offense for which the releasee was convicted.

(b) The Texas Board of Criminal Justice by rule shall adopt procedures for the administration of a test required under this section.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 12.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 508.185. SUBSTANCE ABUSE TREATMENT. (a) A parole panel shall require as a condition of release on parole or release to mandatory supervision that an inmate who immediately before release is a participant in the program established under Section 501.0931 participate as a releasee in a drug or alcohol abuse continuum of care treatment program.

(b) The Texas Commission on Alcohol and Drug Abuse shall develop the continuum of care treatment program.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 12.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 508.186. SEX OFFENDER REGISTRATION. A parole panel shall require as a condition of parole or mandatory supervision that a releasee required to register as a sex offender under Chapter 62, Code of Criminal Procedure:

(1) register under that chapter; and

(2) submit a blood sample or other specimen to the Department of Public Safety under Subchapter G, Chapter 411, for the purpose of creating a DNA record of the releasee, unless the releasee has already submitted the required specimen under other state law.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 12.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 62, Sec. 10.25, eff. Sept. 1, 1999; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 16, eff. Sept. 1, 2001; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1300, Sec. 9, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1008 (H.B. 867), Sec. 1.06, eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 508.1861. PROHIBITIONS ON INTERNET ACCESS FOR CERTAIN SEX OFFENDERS. (a) This section applies only to a person who, on release, will be required to register as a sex offender under Chapter 62, Code of Criminal Procedure, by court order or otherwise, and:

(1) is serving a sentence for an offense under Section 21.11, 22.011(a)(2), 22.021(a)(1)(B), 33.021, or 43.25, Penal Code;

(2) used the Internet or any other type of electronic device used for Internet access to commit the offense or engage in the conduct for which the person is required to register under Chapter 62, Code of Criminal Procedure; or

(3) is assigned a numeric risk level of two or three based on an assessment conducted under Article 62.007, Code of Criminal Procedure.

(b) If the parole panel releases on parole or to mandatory supervision a person described by Subsection (a), the parole panel as a condition of parole or mandatory supervision shall:

(1) prohibit the releasee from using the Internet to:

(A) access material that is obscene as defined by Section 43.21, Penal Code;

(B) access a commercial social networking site, as defined by Article 62.0061(f), Code of Criminal Procedure;

(C) communicate with any individual concerning sexual relations with an individual who is younger than 17 years of age; or

(D) communicate with another individual the releasee knows is younger than 17 years of age; and

(2) to ensure the releasee's compliance with Subdivision (1), require the releasee to submit to regular inspection or monitoring of each electronic device used by the releasee to access the Internet.

(c) The parole panel may modify at any time the condition described by Subsection (b)(1)(D) if:

(1) the condition interferes with the releasee's ability to attend school or become or remain employed and consequently constitutes an undue hardship for the releasee; or

(2) the releasee is the parent or guardian of an individual who is younger than 17 years of age and the releasee is not otherwise prohibited from communicating with that individual.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 755 (S.B. 689), Sec. 10, eff. September 1, 2009.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 684 (H.B. 372), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 508.1862. SEX OFFENDER TREATMENT. A parole panel shall require as a condition of release on parole or to mandatory supervision that a releasee participate in a sex offender treatment program developed by the department if:

(1) the releasee:

(A) was serving a sentence for an offense under Chapter 21, Penal Code; or

(B) is required to register as a sex offender under Chapter 62, Code of Criminal Procedure; and

(2) immediately before release, the releasee is participating in a sex offender treatment program established under Section 499.054.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1114 (H.B. 3387), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 508.1864. NOTIFICATION TO DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC SAFETY AND LICENSING AUTHORITY. (a) In this section, "health care professional," "license," and "licensing authority" have the meanings assigned by Section 108.051, Occupations Code.

(b) A parole panel that knows an inmate holds or has submitted an application for a license as a health care professional shall immediately notify the Department of Public Safety and the applicable licensing authority if the parole panel requires the inmate as a condition of release on parole or to mandatory supervision to register as a sex offender under Chapter 62, Code of Criminal Procedure.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 789 (H.B. 1899), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 508.187. CHILD SAFETY ZONE. (a) This section applies only to a releasee serving a sentence for an offense under:

(1) Section 43.25 or 43.26, Penal Code;

(2) Section 21.02, 21.11, 22.011, 22.021, or 25.02, Penal Code;

(3) Section 20.04(a)(4), Penal Code, if the releasee committed the offense with the intent to violate or abuse the victim sexually;

(4) Section 30.02, Penal Code, punishable under Subsection (d) of that section, if the releasee committed the offense with the intent to commit a felony listed in Subdivision (2) or (3);

(5) Section 43.05(a)(2), Penal Code; or

(6) Section 20A.02, Penal Code, if the defendant:

(A) trafficked the victim with the intent or knowledge that the victim would engage in sexual conduct, as defined by Section 43.25, Penal Code; or

(B) benefited from participating in a venture that involved a trafficked victim engaging in sexual conduct, as defined by Section 43.25, Penal Code.

(b) A parole panel shall establish a child safety zone applicable to a releasee if the panel determines that a child as defined by Section 22.011(c), Penal Code, was the victim of the offense, by requiring as a condition of parole or mandatory supervision that the releasee:

(1) not:

(A) supervise or participate in any program that includes as participants or recipients persons who are 17 years of age or younger and that regularly provides athletic, civic, or cultural activities; or

(B) go in, on, or within a distance specified by the panel of premises where children commonly gather, including a school, day-care facility, playground, public or private youth center, public swimming pool, or video arcade facility; and

(2) attend for a period of time determined necessary by the panel psychological counseling sessions for sex offenders with an individual or organization that provides sex offender treatment or counseling as specified by the parole officer supervising the releasee after release.

(b-1) Notwithstanding Subsection (b)(1)(B), a requirement that a releasee not go in, on, or within a distance specified by a parole panel of certain premises does not apply to a releasee while the releasee is in or going immediately to or from:

(1) a parole office;

(2) premises at which the releasee is participating in a program or activity required as a condition of release;

(3) a residential facility in which the releasee is required to reside as a condition of release;

(4) a private residence in which the releasee is required to reside as a condition of release; or

(5) any other premises, facility, or location that is:

(A) designed to rehabilitate or reform the releasee; or

(B) authorized by the division as a premises, facility, or location where it is reasonable and necessary for the releasee to be present and at which the releasee has legitimate business, including a church, synagogue, or other established place of religious worship, a workplace, a health care facility, or a location of a funeral.

(c) A parole officer who under Subsection (b)(2) specifies a sex offender treatment provider to provide counseling to a releasee shall:

(1) contact the provider before the releasee is released;

(2) establish the date, time, and place of the first session between the releasee and the provider; and

(3) request the provider to immediately notify the officer if the releasee fails to attend the first session or any subsequent scheduled session.

(d) At any time after the imposition of a condition under Subsection (b)(1), the releasee may request the parole panel to modify the child safety zone applicable to the releasee because the zone as created by the panel:

(1) interferes with the releasee's ability to attend school or hold a job and consequently constitutes an undue hardship for the releasee; or

(2) is broader than necessary to protect the public, given the nature and circumstances of the offense.

(e) A parole officer supervising a releasee may permit the releasee to enter on an event-by-event basis into the child safety zone that the releasee is otherwise prohibited from entering if:

(1) the releasee has served at least two years of the period of supervision imposed on release;

(2) the releasee enters the zone as part of a program to reunite with the releasee's family;

(3) the releasee presents to the parole officer a written proposal specifying:

(A) where the releasee intends to go within the zone;

(B) why and with whom the releasee is going; and

(C) how the releasee intends to cope with any stressful situations that occur;

(4) the sex offender treatment provider treating the releasee agrees with the officer that the releasee should be allowed to attend the event; and

(5) the officer and the treatment provider agree on a chaperon to accompany the releasee, and the chaperon agrees to perform that duty.

(f) In this section, "playground," "premises," "school," "video arcade facility," and "youth center" have the meanings assigned by Section 481.134, Health and Safety Code.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 12.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 978, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 593 (H.B. 8), Sec. 3.41, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 515 (H.B. 2014), Sec. 3.03, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 997 (H.B. 1111), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 508.188. COMMUNITY SERVICE FOR CERTAIN RELEASEES. A parole panel shall require as a condition of parole or mandatory supervision that a releasee for whom the court has made an affirmative finding under Article 42.014, Code of Criminal Procedure, perform not less than 300 hours of community service at a project designated by the parole panel that primarily serves the person or group that was the target of the releasee.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 12.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 508.189. PAROLE FEE FOR CERTAIN RELEASEES. (a) A parole panel shall require as a condition of parole or mandatory supervision that a releasee convicted of an offense under Section 21.02, 21.08, 21.11, 22.011, 22.021, 25.02, 43.25, or 43.26, Penal Code, pay to the division a parole supervision fee of $5 each month during the period of parole supervision.

(b) The division shall send fees collected under this section to the comptroller. The comptroller shall deposit the fees in the general revenue fund to the credit of the sexual assault program fund established under Section 44.0061, Health and Safety Code.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 12.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 593 (H.B. 8), Sec. 3.42, eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 508.190. AVOIDING VICTIM OF STALKING OFFENSE. (a) A parole panel shall require as a condition of parole or mandatory supervision that a releasee serving a sentence for an offense under Section 42.072, Penal Code, not:

(1) communicate directly or indirectly with the victim;

(2) go to or near the residence, place of employment, or business of the victim; or

(3) go to or near a school, day-care facility, or similar facility where a dependent child of the victim is in attendance.

(b) If a parole panel requires the prohibition contained in Subsection (a)(2) or (3) as a condition of parole or mandatory supervision, the parole panel shall specifically describe the prohibited locations and the minimum distances, if any, that the releasee must maintain from the locations.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 62, Sec. 10.26, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 508.191. NO CONTACT WITH VICTIM. (a) If a parole panel releases a defendant on parole or to mandatory supervision, the panel shall require as a condition of parole or mandatory supervision that the defendant not intentionally or knowingly communicate directly or indirectly with a victim of the offense or intentionally or knowingly go near a residence, school, place of employment, or business of a victim. At any time after the defendant is released on parole or to mandatory supervision, a victim of the offense may petition the panel for a modification of the conditions of the defendant's parole or mandatory supervision allowing the defendant contact with the victim subject to reasonable restrictions.

(b) Notwithstanding Subsection (a), a defendant may participate in victim-offender mediation authorized by Section 508.324 on the request of the victim or a guardian of the victim or a close relative of a deceased victim.

(c) In this section, "victim" has the meaning assigned by Article 56A.001, Code of Criminal Procedure.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 62, Sec. 10.27, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 469 (H.B. 4173), Sec. 2.48, eff. January 1, 2021.

Sec. 508.192. REENTRY INTO THE UNITED STATES PROHIBITED. (a) In this section, "illegal criminal alien" has the meaning assigned by Section 493.015.

(b) A parole panel shall require as a condition of parole or mandatory supervision that an illegal criminal alien released to the custody of United States Immigration and Customs Enforcement:

(1) regardless of whether a final order of deportation is issued with reference to the illegal criminal alien, leave the United States as soon as possible after release; and

(2) not unlawfully return to or unlawfully reenter the United States in violation of the Immigration Reform and Control Act of 1986 (8 U.S.C. Section 1101 et seq.).

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1025 (H.B. 2734), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2011.

SUBCHAPTER G. DISCRETIONARY CONDITIONS OF PAROLE OR MANDATORY SUPERVISION

Sec. 508.221. CONDITIONS PERMITTED GENERALLY. A parole panel may impose as a condition of parole or mandatory supervision any condition that a court may impose on a defendant placed on community supervision under Chapter 42A, Code of Criminal Procedure, including the condition that a releasee submit to testing for controlled substances or submit to electronic monitoring if the parole panel determines that without testing for controlled substances or participation in an electronic monitoring program the inmate would not be released on parole.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 12.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 770 (H.B. 2299), Sec. 2.55, eff. January 1, 2017.

Sec. 508.222. PAYMENT OF CERTAIN DAMAGES. A parole panel may require as a condition of parole or mandatory supervision that a releasee make payments in satisfaction of damages for which the releasee is liable under Section 500.002.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 12.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 508.223. PSYCHOLOGICAL COUNSELING. A parole panel may require as a condition of parole or mandatory supervision that a releasee serving a sentence for an offense under Section 42.072, Penal Code, attend psychological counseling sessions of a type and for a duration as specified by the parole panel, if the parole panel determines in consultation with a local mental health services provider that appropriate mental health services are available through the Department of State Health Services in accordance with Section 534.053, Health and Safety Code, or through another mental health services provider.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 12.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 62, Sec. 10.28, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 30 (H.B. 446), Sec. 5.17, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 508.224. SUBSTANCE ABUSE COUNSELING. A parole panel may require as a condition of parole or mandatory supervision that the releasee attend counseling sessions for substance abusers or participate in substance abuse treatment services in a program or facility approved or licensed by the Texas Commission on Alcohol and Drug Abuse if:

(1) the releasee was sentenced for an offense involving a controlled substance; or

(2) the panel determines that the releasee's substance abuse was related to the commission of the offense.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 12.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 508.225. CHILD SAFETY ZONE. (a) If the nature of the offense for which an inmate is serving a sentence warrants the establishment of a child safety zone, a parole panel may establish a child safety zone applicable to an inmate serving a sentence for an offense listed in Article 42A.054(a), Code of Criminal Procedure, or for which the judgment contains an affirmative finding under Article 42A.054(c) or (d), Code of Criminal Procedure, by requiring as a condition of parole or release to mandatory supervision that the inmate not:

(1) supervise or participate in any program that includes as participants or recipients persons who are 17 years of age or younger and that regularly provides athletic, civic, or cultural activities; or

(2) go in or on, or within a distance specified by the panel of, a premises where children commonly gather, including a school, day-care facility, playground, public or private youth center, public swimming pool, or video arcade facility.

(a-1) Notwithstanding Subsection (a)(2), a requirement that an inmate not go in, on, or within a distance specified by a parole panel of certain premises does not apply to an inmate while the inmate is in or going immediately to or from:

(1) a parole office;

(2) premises at which the inmate is participating in a program or activity required as a condition of release;

(3) a residential facility in which the inmate is required to reside as a condition of release;

(4) a private residence in which the inmate is required to reside as a condition of release; or

(5) any other premises, facility, or location that is:

(A) designed to rehabilitate or reform the inmate; or

(B) authorized by the division as a premises, facility, or location where it is reasonable and necessary for the inmate to be present and at which the inmate has legitimate business, including a church, synagogue, or other established place of religious worship, a workplace, a health care facility, or a location of a funeral.

(b) At any time after the imposition of a condition under Subsection (a), the inmate may request the parole panel to modify the child safety zone applicable to the inmate because the zone as created by the panel:

(1) interferes with the ability of the inmate to attend school or hold a job and consequently constitutes an undue hardship for the inmate; or

(2) is broader than is necessary to protect the public, given the nature and circumstances of the offense.

(c) This section does not apply to an inmate described by Section 508.187.

(d) In this section, "playground," "premises," "school," "video arcade facility," and "youth center" have the meanings assigned by Section 481.134, Health and Safety Code.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 56, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 770 (H.B. 2299), Sec. 2.56, eff. January 1, 2017.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 997 (H.B. 1111), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 508.226. ORCHIECTOMY AS CONDITION PROHIBITED. A parole panel may not require an inmate to undergo an orchiectomy as a condition of release on parole or to mandatory supervision.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 62, Sec. 10.29, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Renumbered from Sec. 508.225 by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 21.001(45), eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 508.227. ELECTRONIC MONITORING OF CERTAIN MEMBERS OF CRIMINAL STREET GANG. (a) This section applies only to a releasee who:

(1) is identified as a member of a criminal street gang in an intelligence database established under Chapter 67, Code of Criminal Procedure; and

(2) has three or more times been convicted of, or received a grant of deferred adjudication community supervision or another functionally equivalent form of community supervision or probation for, a felony offense under the laws of this state, another state, or the United States.

(b) A parole panel may require as a condition of release on parole or to mandatory supervision that a releasee described by Subsection (a) submit to tracking under an electronic monitoring service or other appropriate technological service designed to track a person's location.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1130 (H.B. 2086), Sec. 20, eff. September 1, 2009.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1058 (H.B. 2931), Sec. 4.12, eff. January 1, 2019.

Sec. 508.228. SEX OFFENDER TREATMENT. A parole panel may require as a condition of release on parole or to mandatory supervision that a releasee participate in a sex offender treatment program as specified by the parole panel if:

(1) the releasee:

(A) was serving a sentence for an offense under Chapter 21, Penal Code; or

(B) is required to register as a sex offender under Chapter 62, Code of Criminal Procedure; or

(2) a designated agent of the board after conducting a hearing that allows the releasee to contest the evidence, on evidence that a sex offense occurred during the commission of the offense for which the releasee was serving a sentence, makes an affirmative finding that, regardless of the offense for which the releasee was serving a sentence, the releasee constitutes a threat to society because of the releasee's lack of sexual control.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1114 (H.B. 3387), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2015.

SUBCHAPTER H. WARRANTS

Sec. 508.251. ISSUANCE OF WARRANT OR SUMMONS. (a) In a case of parole or mandatory supervision, the director or a designated agent of the director or, in another case, the board on order by the governor, may issue a warrant as provided by Section 508.252 for the return of:

(1) a releasee;

(2) an inmate released although not eligible for release;

(3) a resident released to a preparole or work program;

(4) an inmate released on emergency reprieve or on emergency absence under escort; or

(5) a person released on a conditional pardon.

(b) A warrant issued under Subsection (a) must require the return of the person to the institution from which the person was paroled or released.

(c) Instead of the issuance of a warrant under this section, the division:

(1) may issue to the person a summons requiring the person to appear for a hearing under Section 508.281 if the person:

(A) is not a releasee who is:

(i) on intensive supervision or superintensive supervision;

(ii) an absconder; or

(iii) determined by the division to be a threat to public safety; or

(B) is charged only with committing a new offense that is alleged to have been committed after the first anniversary of the date the person was released on parole or to mandatory supervision if:

(i) the new offense is a Class C misdemeanor under the Penal Code, other than an offense committed against a child younger than 17 years of age or an offense involving family violence, as defined by Section 71.004, Family Code;

(ii) the person has maintained steady employment for at least one year;

(iii) the person has maintained a stable residence for at least one year; and

(iv) the person has not previously been charged with an offense after the person was released on parole or to mandatory supervision; and

(2) shall issue to the person a summons requiring the person to appear for a hearing under Section 508.281 if the person:

(A) is charged only with committing an administrative violation of release that is alleged to have been committed after the first anniversary of the date the person was released on parole or to mandatory supervision;

(B) is not serving a sentence for, and has not been previously convicted of, an offense listed in or described by Article 62.001(5), Code of Criminal Procedure; and

(C) is not a releasee with respect to whom a summons may not be issued under Subdivision (1).

(c-1) A summons issued under Subsection (c) must state the time, date, place, and purpose of the hearing.

(d) A designated agent of the director acts independently from a parole officer and must receive specialized training as determined by the director.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 12.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 264, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 546 (H.B. 2735), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 693 (H.B. 710), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 508.252. GROUNDS FOR ISSUANCE OF WARRANT OR SUMMONS. A warrant or summons may be issued under Section 508.251 if:

(1) there is reason to believe that the person has been released although not eligible for release;

(2) the person has been arrested for an offense;

(3) there is a document that is self-authenticating as provided by Rule 902, Texas Rules of Evidence, stating that the person violated a rule or condition of release; or

(4) there is reliable evidence that the person has exhibited behavior during the person's release that indicates to a reasonable person that the person poses a danger to society that warrants the person's immediate return to custody.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 12.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 62, Sec. 10.30, eff. Sept. 1, 1999; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 264, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 508.253. EFFECT ON SENTENCE AFTER ISSUANCE OF WARRANT. If it appears a releasee has violated a condition or provision of the releasee's parole or mandatory supervision, the date of the issuance of the warrant to the date of the releasee's arrest is not counted as a part of the time served under the releasee's sentence.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 12.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 508.254. DETENTION UNDER WARRANT. (a) A person who is the subject of a warrant may be held in custody pending a determination of all facts surrounding the alleged offense, violation of a rule or condition of release, or dangerous behavior.

(b) A warrant authorizes any officer named by the warrant to take custody of the person and detain the person until a parole panel orders the return of the person to the institution from which the person was released.

(c) Except as provided by Subsection (d), pending a hearing on a charge of parole violation, ineligible release, or violation of a condition of mandatory supervision, a person returned to custody shall remain confined.

(d) A magistrate of the county in which the person is held in custody may release the person on bond pending the hearing if:

(1) the person is arrested or held in custody only on a charge that the person committed an administrative violation of release;

(2) the division, in accordance with Subsection (e), included notice on the warrant for the person's arrest that the person is eligible for release on bond; and

(3) the magistrate determines that the person is not a threat to public safety.

(e) The division shall include a notice on the warrant for the person's arrest indicating that the person is eligible for release on bond under Subsection (d) if the division determines that the person:

(1) has not been previously convicted of:

(A) an offense under Chapter 29, Penal Code;

(B) an offense under Title 5, Penal Code, punishable as a felony; or

(C) an offense involving family violence, as defined by Section 71.004, Family Code;

(2) is not on intensive supervision or super-intensive supervision;

(3) is not an absconder; and

(4) is not a threat to public safety.

(f) The provisions of Chapters 17 and 22, Code of Criminal Procedure, apply to a person released under Subsection (d) in the same manner as those provisions apply to a person released pending an appearance before a court or magistrate, except that the release under that subsection is conditioned on the person's appearance at a hearing under this subchapter.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 12.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 472 (S.B. 790), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 508.255. STATUS AS FUGITIVE FROM JUSTICE. (a) After the issuance of a warrant, a person for whose return a warrant was issued is a fugitive from justice.

(b) The law relating to the right of the state to extradite a person and return a fugitive from justice and Article 42.11, Code of Criminal Procedure, relating to the waiver of all legal requirements to obtain extradition of a fugitive from justice from another state to this state, are not impaired by this chapter and remain in full force and effect.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 12.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 508.256. WITHDRAWAL OF WARRANT. At any time before setting a revocation hearing date under Section 508.282, the division may withdraw a warrant and continue supervision of a releasee.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 12.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

SUBCHAPTER I. HEARINGS AND SANCTIONS

Sec. 508.281. HEARING. (a) A releasee, a person released although ineligible for release, or a person granted a conditional pardon is entitled to a hearing before a parole panel or a designated agent of the board under the rules adopted by the board and within a period that permits a parole panel, a designee of the board, or the department to dispose of the charges within the periods established by Sections 508.282(a) and (b) if the releasee or person:

(1) is accused of a violation of the releasee's parole or mandatory supervision or the person's conditional pardon, on information and complaint by a peace officer or parole officer; or

(2) is arrested after an ineligible release.

(b) If a parole panel or designated agent of the board determines that a releasee or person granted a conditional pardon has been convicted of a felony offense committed while an administrative releasee and has been sentenced to a term of confinement in a penal institution, the determination is considered to be a sufficient hearing to revoke the parole or mandatory supervision or recommend to the governor revocation of a conditional pardon without further hearing, except that the parole panel or designated agent shall conduct a hearing to consider mitigating circumstances if requested by the releasee or person granted a conditional pardon.

Text of subsection as amended by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 472 (S.B. 790), Sec. 2

(c) If a designated agent of the board determines that a releasee who appears in compliance with a summons has violated a condition of release, the agent shall notify the board. After the board or a parole panel makes a final determination regarding the violation, the division may issue a warrant requiring the releasee to be held in a county jail pending the return of the releasee to the institution from which the releasee was released.

Text of subsection as amended by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 693 (H.B. 710), Sec. 2

(c) If a hearing before a designated agent of the board is held under this section for a releasee who appears in compliance with a summons, the sheriff of the county in which the releasee is required to appear shall provide the designated agent with a place at the county jail to hold the hearing. After the board or a parole panel makes a final determination that a releasee has violated a condition of release, a warrant may be issued requiring the releasee to be held in the county jail pending:

(1) transfer to an intermediate sanction facility; or

(2) the return of the releasee to the institution from which the releasee was released.

(d) If a parole panel or designated agent of the board determines that a releasee has violated a condition of release required under Section 508.192 and confirms the violation with a peace officer or other law enforcement officer of this state who is authorized under federal law to verify a person's immigration status or, in accordance with 8 U.S.C. Section 1373(c), with a federal law enforcement officer, the determination is considered to be a sufficient hearing to revoke the parole or mandatory supervision without further hearing or determination, except that the parole panel or designated agent shall conduct a hearing to consider mitigating circumstances, if requested by the releasee.

(e) A parole panel or designated agent of the board may not revoke the parole or mandatory supervision of a releasee if the parole panel or designated agent finds that the only evidence supporting the alleged violation of a condition of release is the uncorroborated results of a polygraph examination.

(f) Any hearing required to be conducted by a parole panel under this chapter may be conducted by a designated agent of the board. The designated agent may make recommendations to a parole panel that has responsibility for making a final determination.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 12.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 62, Sec. 10.31, eff. Sept. 1, 1999; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 264, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 2003; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., 3rd C.S., ch. 3, Sec. 11.20, eff. Jan. 11, 2004.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1025 (H.B. 2734), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1154 (S.B. 213), Sec. 19, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1160 (S.B. 358), Sec. 3, eff. June 14, 2013.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 472 (S.B. 790), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 693 (H.B. 710), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1236 (S.B. 1296), Sec. 21.001(25), eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 508.2811. PRELIMINARY HEARING. A parole panel or a designee of the board shall provide within a reasonable time to an inmate or person described by Section 508.281(a) a preliminary hearing to determine whether probable cause or reasonable grounds exist to believe that the inmate or person has committed an act that would constitute a violation of a condition of release, unless the inmate or person:

(1) waives the preliminary hearing; or

(2) after release:

(A) has been charged only with an administrative violation of a condition of release; or

(B) has been adjudicated guilty of or has pleaded guilty or nolo contendere to an offense committed after release, other than an offense punishable by fine only involving the operation of a motor vehicle, regardless of whether the court has deferred disposition of the case, imposed a sentence in the case, or placed the inmate or person on community supervision.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 62, Sec. 10.32, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 508.282. DEADLINES. (a) Except as provided by Subsection (b), a parole panel, a designee of the board, or the department shall dispose of the charges against an inmate or person described by Section 508.281(a):

(1) before the 41st day after the date on which a warrant issued as provided by Section 508.251 is executed, if the inmate or person is arrested only on a charge that the inmate or person has committed an administrative violation of a condition of release; or

(2) before the 91st day after the date on which a warrant issued as provided by Section 508.251 is executed, if:

(A) the inmate or person allegedly committed an offense after release; and

(B) an indictment, information, or complaint for the offense has not been filed in court.

(b) A parole panel, a designee of the board, or the department is not required to dispose of the charges against an inmate or person within the period required by Subsection (a) if:

(1) the inmate or person is in custody in another state or a federal correctional institution;

(2) the parole panel or a designee of the board is not provided a place by the sheriff to hold the hearing, in which event the department, parole panel, or designee is not required to dispose of the charges against the inmate or person until the 30th day after the date on which the sheriff provides a place to hold the hearing; or

(3) the inmate or person is granted a continuance by a parole panel or a designee of the board in the inmate's or person's hearing under Section 508.281(a), but in no event may a parole panel, a designee of the board, or the department dispose of the charges against the person later than the 15th day after the date on which the parole panel, designee, or department would otherwise be required to dispose of the charges under this section, unless the inmate or person is released from custody and a summons is issued under Section 508.251 requiring the inmate or person to appear for a hearing under Section 508.281.

(c) In Subsections (a), (b), and (f), charges against an inmate or person are disposed of when:

(1) the inmate's or person's conditional pardon, parole, or release to mandatory supervision is:

(A) revoked; or

(B) continued or modified and the inmate or person is released from the county jail;

(2) the warrant for the inmate or person issued under Section 508.251 is withdrawn; or

(3) the inmate or person is transferred to a facility described by Section 508.284 for further proceedings.

(d) A sheriff, not later than the 10th day before the date on which the sheriff intends to release from custody an inmate or person described by Section 508.281(a) or transfer the inmate or person to the custody of an entity other than the department, shall notify the department of the intended release or transfer.

(e) If a warrant for an inmate or person issued under Section 508.251 is withdrawn, a summons may be issued requiring the inmate or person to appear for a hearing under Section 508.281.

(f) A parole panel, a designee of the board, or the department shall dispose of the charges against a releasee for whom a warrant is issued under Section 508.281(c) not later than the 31st day after the date on which the warrant is issued.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 12.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 62, Sec. 10.33, eff. Sept. 1, 1999; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 264, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 2003; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1194, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1055 (S.B. 374), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 508.283. SANCTIONS. (a) After a parole panel or designated agent of the board has held a hearing under Section 508.281, in any manner warranted by the evidence:

(1) the board may recommend to the governor to continue, revoke, or modify the conditional pardon; and

(2) a parole panel may continue, revoke, or modify the parole or mandatory supervision.

(b) If the parole, mandatory supervision, or conditional pardon of a person described by Section 508.149(a) is revoked, the person may be required to serve the remaining portion of the sentence on which the person was released. The remaining portion is computed without credit for the time from the date of the person's release to the date of revocation.

(c) If the parole, mandatory supervision, or conditional pardon of a person other than a person described by Section 508.149(a) is revoked, the person may be required to serve the remaining portion of the sentence on which the person was released. For a person who on the date of issuance of a warrant or summons initiating the revocation process is subject to a sentence the remaining portion of which is greater than the amount of time from the date of the person's release to the date of issuance of the warrant or summons, the remaining portion is to be served without credit for the time from the date of the person's release to the date of revocation. For a person who on the date of issuance of the warrant or summons is subject to a sentence the remaining portion of which is less than the amount of time from the date of the person's release to the date of issuance of the warrant or summons, the remaining portion is to be served without credit for an amount of time equal to the remaining portion of the sentence on the date of issuance of the warrant or citation.

(d) If a warrant is issued charging a violation of a release condition or a summons is issued for a hearing under Section 508.281, the sentence time credit may be suspended until a determination is made in the case. The suspended time credit may be reinstated if the parole, mandatory supervision, or conditional pardon is continued.

(e) If a person's parole or mandatory supervision is modified after it is established that the person violated conditions of release, the board may require the releasee to remain under custodial supervision in a county jail for a period of not less than 60 days or more than 180 days. A sheriff is required to accept an inmate sanctioned under this subsection only if the commissioners court of the county in which the sheriff serves and the Texas Department of Criminal Justice have entered into a contract providing for the housing of persons sanctioned under this subsection.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 12.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 62, Sec. 10.34, eff. Sept. 1, 1999; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 856, Sec. 7, eff. Sept. 1, 2001; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1197, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1275, Sec. 2(62), eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 508.284. TRANSFER PENDING REVOCATION HEARING. The department, as provided by Section 508.282(c), may authorize a facility that is otherwise required to detain and house an inmate or person to transfer the inmate or person to a correctional facility operated by the department or under contract with the department if:

(1) the department determines that adequate space is available in the facility to which the inmate or person is to be transferred; and

(2) the facility to which the inmate or person is to be transferred is located not more than 150 miles from the facility from which the inmate or person is to be transferred.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 62, Sec. 10.35, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

SUBCHAPTER J. MISCELLANEOUS

Sec. 508.311. DUTY TO PROVIDE INFORMATION. On request of a member of the board or employee of the board or department, a public official of the state, including a judge, district attorney, county attorney, or police officer, who has information relating to an inmate eligible for parole shall send to the department in writing the information in the official's possession or under the official's control.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 12.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 508.312. INFORMATION ON RECIDIVISM OF RELEASEES. The Texas Board of Criminal Justice shall collect information on recidivism of releasees under the supervision of the division and shall use the information to evaluate operations.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 12.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 508.313. CONFIDENTIAL INFORMATION. (a) All information obtained and maintained, including a victim protest letter or other correspondence, a victim impact statement, a list of inmates eligible for release on parole, and an arrest record of an inmate, is confidential and privileged if the information relates to:

(1) an inmate of the institutional division subject to release on parole, release to mandatory supervision, or executive clemency;

(2) a releasee; or

(3) a person directly identified in any proposed plan of release for an inmate.

(b) Statistical and general information relating to the parole and mandatory supervision system, including the names of releasees and data recorded relating to parole and mandatory supervision services, is not confidential or privileged and must be made available for public inspection at any reasonable time.

(c) The department, on request or in the normal course of official business, shall provide information that is confidential and privileged under Subsection (a) to:

(1) the governor;

(2) a member of the board or a parole commissioner;

(3) the Criminal Justice Policy Council in performing duties of the council under Section 413.017; or

(4) an eligible entity requesting information for a law enforcement, prosecutorial, correctional, clemency, or treatment purpose.

(d) In this section, "eligible entity" means:

(1) a government agency, including the office of a prosecuting attorney;

(2) an organization with which the department contracts or an organization to which the department provides a grant; or

(3) an organization to which inmates are referred for services by the department.

(e) This section does not apply to information relating to a sex offender that is authorized for release under Chapter 62, Code of Criminal Procedure.

(f) This section does not apply to information that is subject to required public disclosure under Section 552.029.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 12.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 62, Sec. 10.36, eff. Sept. 1, 1999; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 783, Sec. 3, eff. Aug. 30, 1999; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 856, Sec. 8, eff. Sept. 1, 2001; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 6, Sec. 3, eff. April 10, 2003; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., 3rd C.S., ch. 3, Sec. 11.21, eff. Jan. 11, 2004.

Sec. 508.314. ACCESS TO INMATES. The department shall:

(1) grant to a member or employee of the board access at all reasonable times to any inmate;

(2) provide for the member or employee or a representative of the member or employee facilities for communicating with or observing an inmate; and

(3) furnish to the member or employee:

(A) any report the member or employee requires relating to the conduct or character of an inmate; or

(B) other facts a parole panel considers pertinent in determining whether an inmate will be released on parole.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 12.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 508.315. ELECTRONIC MONITORING PROGRAMS. (a) To establish and maintain an electronic monitoring program under this chapter, the department may:

(1) fund an electronic monitoring program in a parole office;

(2) develop standards for the operation of an electronic monitoring program in a parole office; and

(3) fund the purchase, lease, or maintenance of electronic monitoring equipment.

(b) In determining whether electronic monitoring equipment should be leased or purchased, the department shall consider the rate at which technological change makes electronic monitoring equipment obsolete.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 12.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 508.316. SPECIAL PROGRAMS. (a) The department may contract for services for releasees if funds are appropriated to the department for the services, including services for releasees who have a history of:

(1) mental impairment or intellectual disability;

(2) substance abuse; or

(3) sexual offenses.

(b) The department shall seek funding for a contract under this section as a priority item.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 12.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 30 (H.B. 446), Sec. 5.18, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 508.317. INTENSIVE SUPERVISION PROGRAM; SUPER-INTENSIVE SUPERVISION PROGRAM. (a) The department shall establish a program to provide intensive supervision to inmates released under Subchapter B, Chapter 499, and other inmates determined by a parole panel or the department to require intensive supervision.

(b) The Texas Board of Criminal Justice shall adopt rules that establish standards for determining which inmates require intensive supervision.

(c) The program must provide the level of supervision the department provides that is higher than any level of supervision other than the level of supervision described by Subsection (d).

(d) The department shall establish a program to provide super-intensive supervision to inmates released on parole or mandatory supervision and determined by parole panels to require super-intensive supervision. The program must provide the highest level of supervision provided by the department.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 12.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 62, Sec. 10.37, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 508.318. CONTINUING EDUCATION PROGRAM. (a) The Texas Board of Criminal Justice and the Texas Education Agency shall adopt a memorandum of understanding that establishes the respective responsibilities of the board and the agency in implementing a continuing education program to increase the literacy of releasees.

(b) The Texas Board of Criminal Justice and the agency shall coordinate the development of the memorandum of understanding and each by rule shall adopt the memorandum.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 12.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 508.319. PROGRAM TO ASSESS AND ENHANCE EDUCATIONAL AND VOCATIONAL SKILLS. (a) The department, with the assistance of public school districts, community and public junior colleges, public and private institutions of higher education, and other appropriate public and private entities, may establish a developmental program based on information obtained under Section 508.183 for an inmate to be released to the supervision of the division.

(b) The developmental program may provide the inmate with the educational and vocational training necessary to:

(1) meet the average skill level required under Section 508.183; and

(2) acquire employment while in the custody of the division to lessen the likelihood that the inmate will return to the institutional division.

(c) To decrease state expense for a program established under this section, the Texas Workforce Commission shall provide to the department and the other entities described by Subsection (a) information relating to obtaining financial assistance under applicable programs of public or private entities.

(d) The department may establish a developmental program similar to the program described by Subsection (a) for inmates released from the institutional division who will not be supervised by the department.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 12.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 508.320. CONTRACTS FOR LEASE OF FEDERAL FACILITIES. (a) The department may contract with the federal government for the lease of a military base or other federal facility that is not being used by the federal government.

(b) The department may use a facility leased under this section to house releasees in the custody of the division.

(c) The department may not enter into a contract under this section unless funds have been appropriated specifically to make payments on a contract under this section.

(d) The department shall attempt to enter into contracts that will provide the department with facilities located in various parts of the state.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 12.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 508.321. REPORTING, MANAGEMENT, AND COLLECTION SERVICES. The department, with the approval of the Texas Board of Criminal Justice, may contract with a public or private vendor to provide telephone reporting, automated caseload management, or collection services for:

(1) fines, fees, restitution, or other costs ordered to be paid by a court; or

(2) fees collected by the division.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 12.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 508.322. RELEASEE RESTITUTION FUND. (a) The releasee restitution fund is a fund outside the treasury and consists of restitution payments made by releasees. Money in the fund may be used only to pay restitution as required by a condition of parole or mandatory supervision to victims of criminal offenses.

(b) The comptroller is the trustee of the releasee restitution fund as provided by Section 404.073.

(c) When a parole panel orders the payment of restitution from a releasee as provided by Article 42.037(h), Code of Criminal Procedure, the department shall:

(1) collect the payment for disbursement to the victim;

(2) deposit the payment in the releasee restitution fund; and

(3) transmit the payment to the clerk of the court that entered the order of restitution as soon as practicable for the clerk to remit the payment to the victim.

(c-1) The department shall include the releasee's name and other relevant identifying information, the cause number, and the payment amount when transmitting a payment to the clerk of the court under Subsection (c)(3).

(c-2) On receipt of a payment transmitted to the clerk of the court under Subsection (c)(3), the clerk shall process and account for the payment in the same manner as if the payment had been made directly to the clerk.

(d) If a victim who is entitled to restitution cannot be located, immediately after receiving a final payment in satisfaction of an order of restitution for the victim, the clerk of the court shall attempt to notify the victim of that fact by certified mail, mailed to the last known address of the victim. If a victim then makes a claim for payment, the clerk of the court promptly shall remit the payment to the victim.

(e) If a victim who is entitled to restitution does not make a claim for payment before the fifth anniversary of the date the clerk of the court receives the initial restitution payment or if, after the victim makes a claim for payment, the clerk is unable to locate the victim for a period of five years after the date the clerk last made a payment to the victim, any unclaimed restitution payments being held by the clerk for payment to the victim are presumed abandoned. The clerk of the court shall report and deliver to the comptroller all unclaimed restitution payments presumed abandoned under this section in the manner provided by Chapter 77, Property Code.

(f) If on March 1 a clerk of the court is not holding unclaimed restitution payments that are presumed abandoned under this section, the clerk shall file a property report under Section 77.051, Property Code, that certifies that the clerk is not holding any unclaimed restitution payments that are presumed abandoned under this section.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 12.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 856, Sec. 9, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 351 (H.B. 1866), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 864 (H.B. 3603), Sec. 1, eff. December 1, 2023.

Sec. 508.323. AUDIT. The financial transactions of the division and the board are subject to audit by the state auditor in accordance with Chapter 321.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 12.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 508.324. VICTIM-OFFENDER MEDIATION. If the pardons and paroles division receives notice from the victim services office of the department that a victim of the defendant, or the victim's guardian or close relative, wishes to participate in victim-offender mediation with a person released on parole or to mandatory supervision, the division shall cooperate and assist the person if the person chooses to participate in the mediation program provided by the office. The pardons and paroles division may not require the defendant to participate and may not reward the person for participation by modifying conditions of release or the person's level of supervision or by granting any other benefit to the person.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 62, Sec. 10.38, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.